The Civil War in France

Karl Marx

1871

Written: July 1870 - May 1871;
First Published: 1871;
Source: English Edition of 1871;
Transcription/Markup: Zodiac & Brian Baggins;
Proofed: and corrected by Matthew Carmody 2009;
HTML Source:
http://www.marxists.org/archive/marx/works/1871/civil-war-france/index.htm;

Contents

Introduction
Introduction by Frederick Engels
Chapter 1 - The Begining of the Franco-Prussian War
Chapter 2 - Prussian Occupation of France
Chapter 3 - France Capitulates & the Government of Thiers
Chapter 4 - Paris Workers’ Revolution & Thiers’ Reactionary Massacres
Chapter 5 - The Paris Commune
Chapter 6 - The Fall of Paris
Appendix
     1891 Postscript by Friedrich Engels
     News stories
     Marx to Dr. Kugelmann
     History of Paris Commune by Lissagaray, 1876
     Timeline of the Civil War

 Introduction

Written by Karl Marx as an address to the General Council of the
International, with the aim of distributing to workers of all countries
a clear understanding of the character and world-wide significance of
the heroic struggle of the Communards and their historical experience to
learn from. The book was widely circulated by 1872 it was translated
into several languages and published throughout Europe and the United
States.

The first address was delivered on July 23rd, 1870, five days after the
beginning of the Franco-Prussian War. The second address, delivered on
September 9, 1870, gave a historical overview of the events a week after
the army of Bonaparte was defeated. The third address, delivered on May
30, 1871, two days after the defeat of the Paris Commune – detailed the
significance and the underlining causes of the first workers government
ever created.

Publication Information: The Civil War in France was originally
published by Marx as only the third address (here comprising Chapters 3
through 6) separated into four chapters. In 1891, on the 20th
anniversary of the Paris Commune, Engels put together a new collection
of the work. Engels decided to include the first two addresses that Marx
made to the International (Chapters 1 and 2) – in this way providing
additional historical background to the Civil War; Marx’s account of the
Franco-Prussian War (July to September, 1870). In this publication,
basic titles have been provided for each chapter in brackets, to give
the unfamiliar reader a basic guide to the historical events each
chapter discusses. Also, Engels 1891 introduction has been separated
into two parts: an introduction (below) and a postscript.

 1891 Introduction by Frederick Engels
 On the 20th Anniversary of the Paris Commune

 [Historical Background & Overview of the Civil War]

Thanks to the economic and political development of France since [the
French Revolution of] 1789, for 50 years the position of Paris has been
such that no revolutions could break out there without assuming a
proletarian character, that is to say, the proletariat, which had bought
victory with its blood, would advance its own demands after victory.
These demands were more or less unclear and even confused, corresponding
to the state of evolution reached by the workers of Paris at the
particular period, but in the last resort they all amounted to the
abolition of the class antagonism between capitalist and workers. It is
true that no one knew how this was to be brought about. But the demand
itself, however indefinite it still was in its formulation, contained a
threat to the existing order of society; the workers who put it forward
were still armed; therefore the disarming of the workers was the first
commandment for the bourgeois at the helm of the state. Hence, after
every revolution won by the workers, a new struggle, ending with the
defeat of the workers.

This happened for the first time in 1848. The liberal bourgeoisie of the
parliamentary opposition held banquets for securing reform of the
franchise, which was to ensure supremacy for their party. Forced more
and more, in their struggle with the government, to appeal to the
people, they had to allow the radical and republican strata of the
bourgeoisie and petty bourgeoisie gradually to take the lead. But behind
these stood the revolutionary workers, and since 1830,[A] these had
acquired far more political independence than the bourgeoisie, and even
the republicans, suspected. At the moment of the crisis between the
government and the opposition, the workers opened battle on the streets;
[King] Louis Philippe vanished, and with him the franchise reform; and
in its place arose the republic, and indeed one which the victorious
workers themselves designated as a “social” republic. No one, however,
was clear as to what this social republic was to imply; not even the
workers themselves. But they now had arms in their hands, and were a
power in the state. Therefore, as soon as the bourgeois republicans in
control felt something like firm ground under their feet, their first
aim was to disarm the workers. This took place by driving them into the
insurrection of June 1848 by direct breach of faith, by open defiance
and the attempt to banish the unemployed to a distant province. The
government had taken care to have an overwhelming superiority of force.
After five days’ heroic struggle, the workers were defeated. And then
followed a blood-bath of the defenceless prisoners, the likes of which
as not been seen since the days of the civil wars which ushered in the
downfall of the Roman republic. It was the first time that the
bourgeoisie showed to what insane cruelties of revenge it will be goaded
the moment the proletariat dares to take its stand against them as a
separate class, with its own interests and demands. And yet 1848 was
only child’s play compared with their frenzy in 1871.

Punishment followed hard at heel. If the proletariat was not yet able to
rule France, the bourgeoisie could no longer do so. At least not at that
period, when the greater part of it was still monarchically inclined,
and it was divided into three dynastic parties [Legitimists, Orleanists
and Bonapartists] and a fourth republican party. Its internal
dissensions allowed the adventurer Louis Bonaparte to take possession of
all the commanding points – army, police, administrative machinery –
and, on December 2, 1851,^([B]) to explode the last stronghold of the
bourgeoisie, the National Assembly. The Second Empire opened the
exploitation of France by a gang of political and financial adventurers,
but at the same time also an industrial development such as had never
been possible under the narrow-minded and timorous system of Louis
Philippe, with its exclusive domination by only a small section of the
big bourgeoisie. Louis Bonaparte took the political power from the
capitalists under the pretext of protecting them, the bourgeoisie, from
the workers, and on the other hand the workers from them; but in return
his rule encouraged speculation and industrial activity – in a word the
rise and enrichment of the whole bourgeoisie to an extent hitherto
unknown. To an even greater extent, it is true, corruption and mass
robbery developed, clustering around the imperial court, and drawing
their heavy percentages from this enrichment.

But the Second Empire was the appeal to the French chauvinism, the
demand for the restoration of the frontiers of the First Empire, which
had been lost in 1814, or at least those of the First Republic.^([C]) A
French empire within the frontiers of the old monarchy and, in fact,
within the even more amputated frontiers of 1815 – such a thing was
impossible for any long duration of time. Hence the necessity for brief
wars and extension of frontiers. But no extension of frontiers was so
dazzling to the imagination of the French chauvinists as the extension
to the German left bank of the Rhine. One square mile on the Rhine was
more to them than ten in the Alps or anywhere else. Given the Second
Empire, the demand for the restoration to France of the left bank of the
Rhine, either all at once or piecemeal, was merely a question of time.
The time came with the Austro-Prussian War of 1866; cheated of the
anticipated “territorial compensation” by Bismarck, and by his own
over-cunning, hesitating policy, there was now nothing left for Napoleon
but war, which broke out in 1870 and drove him first to Sedan, and then
to Wilhelmshohe [prison].

The inevitable result was the Paris Revolution of September 4, 1870. The
empire collapsed like a house of cards, and the republic was again
proclaimed. But the enemy was standing at the gates [of Paris]; the
armies of the empire were either hopelessly beleaguered in Metz or held
captive in Germany. In this emergency the people allowed the Paris
Deputies to the former legislative body to constitute themselves into a
“Government of National Defence.” This was the more readily conceded,
since, for the purpose of defence, all Parisians capable of bearing arms
had enrolled in the National Guard and were armed, so that now the
workers constituted a great majority. But almost at once the antagonism
between the almost completely bourgeois government and the armed
proletariat broke into open conflict. On October 31, workers’ battalions
stormed the town hall, and captured some members of the government.
Treachery, the government’s direct breach of its undertakings, and the
interventions of some petty-bourgeois battalions set them free again,
and in order not to occasion the outbreak of civil war inside a city
which was already beleaguered by a foreign power, the former government
was left in office.

At last on January 28, 1871, Paris, almost starving, capitulated but
with honors unprecedented in the history of war. The forts were
surrendered, the outer wall disarmed, the weapons of the regiments of
the line and of the Mobile Guard were handed over, and they themselves
considered prisoners of war. But the National Guard kept its weapons and
guns, and only entered into an armistice with the victors, who
themselves did not dare enter Paris in triumph. They only dared to
occupy a tiny corner of Paris, which, into the bargain, consisted partly
of public parks, and even this they only occupied for a few days! And
during this time they, who had maintained their encirclement of Paris
for 131 days, were themselves encircled by the armed workers of Paris,
who kept a sharp watch that no “Prussian” should overstep the narrow
bounds of the corner ceded to the foreign conquerors. Such was the
respect which the Paris workers inspired in the army before which all
the armies of the empire had laid down their arms; and the Prussian
Junkers, who had come to take revenge at the very centre of the
revolution, were compelled to stand by respectfully, and salute just
precisely this armed revolution!

During the war the Paris workers had confined themselves to demanding
the vigorous prosecution of the fight. But now, when peace had come
after the capitulation of Paris,^([D]) now, Thiers, the new head of
government, was compelled to realize that the supremacy of the
propertied classes – large landowners and capitalists – was in constant
danger so long as the workers of Paris had arms in their hands. His
first action was to attempt to disarm them. On March 18, he sent troops
of the line with orders to rob the National Guard of the artillery
belonging to it, which had been constructed during the siege of Paris
and had been paid for by public subscription. The attempt failed; Paris
mobilized as one man in defence of the guns, and war between Paris and
the French government sitting at Versailles was declared. On March 26
the Paris Commune was elected and on March 28 it was proclaimed. The
Central Committee of the National Guard, which up to then had carried on
the government, handed in its resignation to the National Guard, after
it had first decreed the abolition of the scandalous Paris “Morality
Police.” On March 30 the Commune abolished conscription and the standing
army, and declared that the National Guard, in which all citizens
capable of bearing arms were to be enrolled, was to be the sole armed
force. It remitted all payments of rent for dwelling houses from October
1870 until April, the amounts already paid to be reckoned to a future
rental period, and stopped all sales of articles pledged in the
municipal pawnshops. On the same day the foreigners elected to the
Commune were confirmed in office, because “the flag of the Commune is
the flag of the World Republic.”

On April 1 it was decided that the highest salary received by any
employee of the Commune, and therefore also by its members themselves,
might not exceed 6,000 francs. On the following day the Commune decreed
the separation of the Church from the State, and the abolition of all
state payments for religious purposes as well as the transformation of
all Church property into national property; as a result of which, on
April 8, a decree excluding from the schools all religious symbols,
pictures, dogmas, prayers – in a word, “all that belongs to the sphere
of the individual’s conscience” – was ordered to be excluded from the
schools, and this decree was gradually applied. On the 5th, in reply to
the shooting, day after day, of the Commune’s fighters captured by the
Versailles troops, a decree was issued for imprisonment of hostages, but
it was never carried into effect. On the 6th, the guillotine was brought
out by the 137th battalion of the National Guard, and publicly burnt,
amid great popular rejoicing. On the 12th, the Commune decided that the
Victory Column on the Place Vendôme, which had been cast from guns
captured by Napoleon after the war of 1809, should be demolished as a
symbol of chauvinism and incitement to national hatred. This decree was
carried out on May 16. On April 16 the Commune ordered a statistical
tabulation of factories which had been closed down by the manufacturers,
and the working out of plans for the carrying on of these factories by
workers formerly employed in them, who were to be organized in
co-operative societies, and also plans for the organization of these
co-operatives in one great union. On the 20th the Commune abolished
night work for bakers, and also the workers’ registration cards, which
since the Second Empire had been run as a monopoly by police nominees –
exploiters of the first rank; the issuing of these registration cards
was transferred to the mayors of the 20 arrondissements of Paris. On
April 30, the Commune ordered the closing of the pawnshops, on the
ground that they were a private exploitation of labor, and were in
contradiction with the right of the workers to their instruments of
labor and to credit. On May 5 it ordered the demolition of the Chapel of
Atonement, which had been built in expiation of the execution of Louis
XVI.

Thus, from March 18 onwards the class character of the Paris movement,
which had previously been pushed into the background by the fight
against the foreign invaders, emerged sharply and clearly. As almost
without exception, workers, or recognized representatives of the
workers, sat in the Commune, its decision bore a decidedly proletarian
character. Either they decreed reforms which the republican bourgeoisie
had failed to pass solely out of cowardice, but which provided a
necessary basis for the free activity of the working class – such as the
realization of the principle that in relation to the state, religion is
a purely private matter – or they promulgated decrees which were in the
direct interests of the working class and to some extent cut deeply into
the old order of society. In a beleaguered city, however, it was
possible at most to make a start in the realization of all these
measures. And from the beginning of May onwards all their energies were
taken up by the fight against the ever-growing armies assembled by the
Versailles government.

On April 7, the Versailles troops had captured the Seine crossing at
Neuilly, on the western front of Paris; on the other hand, in an attack
on the southern front on the 11th they were repulsed with heavy losses
by General Eudes. Paris was continually bombarded and, moreover, by the
very people who had stigmatized as a sacrilege the bombardment of the
same city by the Prussians. These same people now begged the Prussian
government for the hasty return of the French soldiers taken prisoner at
Sedan and Metz, in order that they might recapture Paris for them. From
the beginning of May the gradual arrival of these troops gave the
Versailles forces a decided ascendancy. This already became evident
when, on April 23, Thiers broke off the negotiations for the exchange,
proposed by Commune, of the Archbishop of Paris [Georges Darboy] and a
whole number of other priests held hostages in Paris, for only one man,
Blanqui, who had twice been elected to the Commune but was a prisoner in
Clairvaux. And even more from the changed language of Thiers; previously
procrastinating and equivocal, he now suddenly became insolent,
threatening, brutal. The Versailles forces took the redoubt of Moulin
Saquet on the southern front, on May 3; on the 9th, Fort Issy, which had
been completely reduced to ruins by gunfire; and on the 14th, Fort
Vanves. On the western front they advanced gradually, capturing the
numerous villages and buildings which extended up to the city wall,
until they reached the main wall itself; on the 21st, thanks to
treachery and the carelessness of the National Guards stationed there,
they succeeded in forcing their way into the city. The Prussians who
held the northern and eastern forts allowed the Versailles troops to
advance across the land north of the city, which was forbidden ground to
them under the armistice, and thus to march forward and attack on a long
front, which the Parisians naturally thought covered by the armistice,
and therefore held only with weak forces. As a result of this, only a
weak resistance was put up in the western half of Paris, in the luxury
city proper; it grew stronger and more tenacious the nearer the incoming
troops approached the eastern half, the real working class city.

It was only after eight days’ fighting that the last defender of the
Commune were overwhelmed on the heights of Belleville and Menilmontant;
and then the massacre of defenceless men, women, and children, which had
been raging all through the week on an increasing scale, reached its
zenith. The breechloaders could no longer kill fast enough; the
vanquished workers were shot down in hundred by mitrailleuse fire [over
30,000 citizens of Paris were massacred]. The “Wall of the Federals”
[aka Wall of the Communards] at the Pere Lachaise cemetery, where the
final mass murder was consummated, is still standing today, a mute but
eloquent testimony to the savagery of which the ruling class is capable
as soon as the working class dares to come out for its rights. Then came
the mass arrests [38,000 workers arrested]; when the slaughter of them
all proved to be impossible, the shooting of victims arbitrarily
selected from the prisoners’ ranks, and the removal of the rest to great
camps where they awaited trial by courts-martial. The Prussian troops
surrounding the northern half of Paris had orders not to allow any
fugitives to pass; but the officers often shut their eyes when the
soldiers paid more obedience to the dictates of humanity than to those
of the General Staff; particularly, honor is due to the Saxon army
corps, which behaved very humanely and let through many workers who were
obviously fighters for the Commune.

Frederick Engels

London, on the 20th anniversary
of the Paris Commune, March 18, 1891.

 Footnotes

A. The revolution of July 1830 in France.

B. The coup d’etat, by Louis Bonaparte on December 2, 1851, which marked
the beginning of the Bonapartist regime of the Second Empire.

C. The first republic was proclaimed in 1792 and was replaced by the
First Empire of Napoleon I (1804-14), which expanded the borders of
France as far east as to include most of Northern Italy and stopped
short of Denmark. Further, Napoleon established a series of satellite
states that stretched throughout central and Eastern Europe, up through
Poland. His attempt to spread his empire into Russia was met with bitter
failure, by the hand of the extremely courageous and the bold resistance
of the Russian land and peasantry.

D. The preliminary peace treaty between France and Germany signed at
Versailles on February 26, 1871 by Thiers and Jules Favre, on the one
hand, and Bismarck, on the other. According to the terms of this treaty,
France ceded Alsace and East Lorraine to Germany and paid it indemnities
to the sum of 5 billion francs. The final peace treaty was signed in
Frankfort-on-Main on May 10, 1871.

Chapter 1
The First Address
 July 23, 1870

[The Beginning of the Franco-Prussian War]

In the Inaugural Address of the International Working Men’s Association,
of November 1864, we said:

“If the emancipation of the working classes requires their fraternal
concurrence, how are they to fulfill that great mission with a foreign
policy in pursuit of criminal designs, playing upon national prejudices,
and squandering in piratical wars the people’s blood and treasure?”

We defined the foreign policy aimed at by the International in these
words:

“Vindicate the simple laws of morals and justice, which ought to govern
the relations of private individuals, as the laws paramount of the
intercourse of nations.”

No wonder that Louis Bonaparte, who usurped power by exploiting the war
of classes in France, and perpetuated it by periodical wars abroad,
should, from the first, have treated the International as a dangerous
foe. On the eve of the plebiscite[A] he ordered a raid on the members of
the Administrative Committee of the International Working Men’s
Association throughout France, at Paris, Lyons, Rouen, Marseilles,
Brest, etc., on the pretext that the International was a secret society
dabbling in a complot for his assassination, a pretext soon after
exposed in its full absurdity by his own judges. What was the real crime
of the French branches of the International? They told the French people
publicly and emphatically that voting the plebiscite was voting
despotism at home and war abroad. It has been, in fact, their work that
in all the great towns, in all the industrial centres of France, the
working class rose like one man to reject the plebiscite. Unfortunately,
the balance was turned by the heavy ignorance of the rural districts.
The stock exchanges, the cabinets, the ruling classes, and the press of
Europe celebrated the plebiscite as a signal victory of the French
emperor over the French working class; and it was the signal for the
assassination, not of an individual, but of nations.

The war plot of July [19] 1870^([B]) is but an amended edition of the
coup d’etat of December 1851. At first view, the thing seemed so absurd
that France would not believe in its real good earnest. It rather
believed the deputy denouncing the ministerial war talk as a mere
stock-jobbing trick. When, on July 15, war was at last officially
announced to the Corps Legislatif, the whole Opposition refused to vote
the preliminary subsidies – even Thiers branded it as “detestable”; all
the independent journals of Paris condemned it, and, wonderful to
relate, the provincial press joined in almost unanimously.

Meanwhile, the Paris members of the International had again set to work.
In the Reveil of July 12, they published their manifesto “to the Workmen
of all Nations,” from which we extract the following few passages:

“Once more,” they say, “on the pretext of European equilibrium, of
national honor, the peace of the world is menaced by political
ambitions. French, German, Spanish workmen! Let our voices unite in one
cry of reprobation against war!

[...]

“War for a question of preponderance or a dynasty can, in the eyes of
workmen, be nothing but a criminal absurdity. In answer to the warlike
proclamations of those who exempt themselves from the blood tax, and
find in public misfortunes a source of fresh speculations, we protest,
we who want peace, labor, and liberty!

[...]

“Brothers in Germany! Our division would only result in the complete
triumph of the despotism on both sides of the Rhine...

“Workmen of all countries! Whatever may for the present become of our
common efforts, we, the members of the International Working Men’s
Association, who know of no frontiers, we send you, as a pledge of
indissoluble solidarity, the good wishes and the salutations of the
workmen of France.”

This manifesto of our Paris section was followed by numerous similar
French addresses, of which we can here only quote the declaration of
Neuilly-sur-Seine, published in the Marseillaise of July 22:

“The war, is it just? No! The war, is it national? No! It is merely
dynastic. In the name of humanity, or democracy, and the true interests
of France, we adhere completely and energetically to the protestation of
the International against the war.”

These protestations expressed the true sentiments of the French working
people, as was soon shown by a curious incident. The Band of the 10th of
December, first organized under the presidency of Louis Bonaparte,
having been masqueraded into blouses [i.e., to appear as common workers]
and let loose on the streets of Paris, there to perform the contortions
of war fever, the real workmen of the Faubourgs [suburbs, workers’
districts] came forward with public peace demonstrations so overwhelming
that Pietri, the Prefect of Police, thought it prudent to stop at once
all further street politics, on the plea that the real Paris people had
given sufficient vent to their pent-up patriotism and exuberant war
enthusiasm.

Whatever may be the incidents of Louis Bonaparte’s war with Prussia, the
death-knell of the Second Empire has already sounded at Paris. It will
end, as it began, by a parody. But let us not forget that it is the
governments and the ruling classes of Europe who enabled Louis Bonaparte
to play during 18 years the ferocious farce of the Restored Empire.

On the German side, the war is a war of defence; but who put Germany to
the necessity of defending herself? Who enabled Louis Bonaparte to wage
war upon her? Prussia! It was Bismarck who conspired with that very same
Louis Bonaparte for the purpose of crushing popular opposition at home,
and annexing Germany to the Hohenzollern dynasty. If the battle of
Sadowa had been lost instead of being won, French battalions would have
overrun Germany as the allies of Prussia. After her victory, did Prussia
dream one moment of opposing a free Germany to an enslaved France? Just
the contrary. While carefully preserving all the native beauties of her
old system, she super-added all the tricks of the Second Empire, its
real despotism, and its mock democratism, its political shams and its
financial jobs, its high-flown talk and its low legerdemains. The
Bonapartist regime, which till then only flourished on one side of the
Rhine, had now got its counterfeit on the other. From such a state of
things, what else could result but war?

If the German working class allows the present war to lose its strictly
defensive character and to degenerate into a war against the French
people, victory or defeat will prove alike disastrous. All the miseries
that befell Germany after her wars of independence will revive with
accumulated intensity.

The principles of the International are, however, too widely spread and
too firmly rooted amongst the German working class to apprehend such a
sad consummation. The voices of the French workmen had re-echoed from
Germany. A mass meeting of workmen, held at Brunswick on July 16,
expressed its full concurrence with the Paris manifesto, spurned the
idea of national antagonism to France, and wound up its resolutions with
these words:

“We are the enemies of all wars, but above all of dynastic wars. ...
With deep sorrow and grief we are forced to undergo a defensive war as
an unavoidable evil; but we call, at the same time, upon the whole
German working class to render the recurrence of such an immense social
misfortune impossible by vindicating for the peoples themselves the
power to decide on peace and war, and making them masters of their own
destinies.”

At Chemnitz, a meeting of delegates, representing 50,000 Saxon workmen,
adopted unanimously a resolution to this effect:

“In the name of German Democracy, and especially of the workmen forming
the Democratic Socialist Party, we declare the present war to be
exclusively dynastic.... We are happy to grasp the fraternal hand
stretched out to us by the workmen of France.... Mindful of the
watchword of the International Working Men’s Association: Proletarians
of all countries, unite, we shall never forget that the workmen of all
countries are our friends and the despots of all countries our enemies.”

The Berlin branch of the International has also replied to the Paris
manifesto:

“We,” they say, “join with heart and hand your protestation....
Solemnly, we promise that neither the sound of the trumpets, nor the
roar of the cannon, neither victory nor defeat, shall divert us from our
common work for the union of the children of toil of all countries.”

Be it so!

In the background of this suicidal strike looms the dark figure of
Russia. It is an ominous sign that the signal for the present war should
have been given at the moment when the Moscovite government had just
finished its strategic lines of railway and was already massing troops
in the direction of the Prut.^([C]) Whatever sympathy the Germans may
justly claim in a war of defense against Bonapartist aggression, they
would forfeit at once by allowing the Prussian government to call for,
or accept the help of, the Cossack. Let them remember that after their
war of independence against the first Napoleon, Germany lay for
generations prostrate at the feet of the tsar.

The English working class stretch the hand of fellowship to the French
and German working people. They feel deeply convinced that whatever turn
the impending horrid war may take, the alliance of the working classes
of all countries will ultimately kill war. The very fact that while
official France and Germany are rushing into a fratricidal feud, the
workmen of France and Germany send each other messages of peace and
goodwill; this great fact, unparalleled in the history of the past,
opens the vista of a brighter future. It proves that in contrast to old
society, with its economical miseries and its political delirium, a new
society is springing up, whose International rule will be Peace, because
its national ruler will be everywhere the same – Labour! The pioneer of
that new society is the International Working Men’s Association.

 Footnotes

^([A]) A plebiscite is a direct vote by an electorate of a nation to
decide a question of national importance, such as governmental policy.
Conducted by Napoleon III in May 1870 the questions were so worded that
it was impossible to express disapproval of the policy of the Second
Empire without declaring opposition to all democratic reforms for the
working class. The sections of the First International in France argued
that their members should not participate in the vote. On the eve of the
plebiscite members of the Paris Federation were arrested on a charge of
conspiring against Napoleon III. This pretext was further used by the
government to launch a campaign of persecution of the members of the
International throughout France. At the trial of the Paris Federation
members (June 22 to July 5, 1870), the charge of conspiracy was clearly
exposed as without any basis. Nevertheless a number of the
International’s members were sentenced to imprisonment based solely on
their socialistic beliefs. The working class of France responded to
these political persecutions with mass protests.

^([B]) The date when Napoleon III declared war on Prussia.

^([C]) The river Prut, rising in the southwestern Ukraine and flowing
southeast, forming part of the border between Roumania (within an
autonomous part of Austria-Hungary) and Russia (later to join the river
Danube). Length: 853 kilometers.

Chapter 2
The Second Address
 September 9, 1870

[Prussian Occupation of France]

In our first manifesto of the 23rd of July, we said:

“The death-knell of the Second Empire has already sounded at Paris. It
will end, as it began, by a parody. But let us not forget that it is the
governments and the ruling classes of Europe who enabled Louis Bonaparte
to play during 18 years the ferocious farce of the Restored Empire.”

Thus, even before war operations had actually set in, we treated the
Bonapartist bubble as a thing of the past.

If we were not mistaken as to the vitality of the Second Empire, we were
not wrong in our apprehension lest the German war should “lose its
strictly defensive character and degenerate into a war against the
French people.” The war of defense ended, in point of fact, with the
surrender of Louis Bonaparte, the Sedan capitulation, and the
proclamation of the republic at Paris. But long before these events, the
very moment that the utter rottenness of the imperialist arms became
evident, the Prussian military camarilla had resolved upon conquest.
There lay an ugly obstacle in their way – [Prussian] King William’s own
proclamations at the commencement of the war.

In a speech from the throne to the North German Diet, he had solemnly
declared to make war upon the emperor of the French and not upon the
French nation, where he said:

“The Emperor Napoleon having made by land and sea an attack on the
German nation, which desired and still desires to live in peace with the
French people, I have assumed the command of the German armies to repel
his aggression, and I have been led by military events to cross the
frontiers of France.”

Not content to assert the defensive character of the war by the
statement that he only assumed the command of the German armies “to
repel aggression", he added that he was only “led by military events” to
cross the frontiers of France. A defensive war does, of course, not
exclude offensive operations, dictated by military events.

Thus, the pious king stood pledged before France and the world to a
strictly defensive war. How to release him from his solemn pledge? The
stage managers had to exhibit him as reluctantly yielding to the
irresistible behest of the German nation. They at once gave the cue to
the liberal German middle class, with its professors, its capitalists,
its aldermen, and its penmen. That middle class, which, in its struggles
for civil liberty, had, from 1846 to 1870, been exhibiting an unexampled
spectacle of irresolution, incapacity and cowardice, felt, of course,
highly delighted to bestride the European scene as the roaring lion of
German patriotism. It re-vindicated its civic independence by affecting
to force upon the Prussian government the secret designs of that same
government. It does penance for its long-continued, and almost
religious, faith in Louis Bonaparte’s infallibility, but shouting for
the dismemberment of the French republic. Let us, for a moment, listen
to the special pleadings of those stout-hearted patriots!

They dare not pretend that the people of Alsace and Lorraine pant for
the German embrace; quite the contrary. To punish their French
patriotism, Strasbourg, a town with an independent citadel commanding
it, has for six days been wantonly and fiendishly bombarded by “German”
explosive shells, setting it on fire, and killing great numbers of its
defenceless inhabitants! Yet, the soil of those provinces once upon a
time belonged to the whilom German empire.[A] Hence, it seems, the soil
and the human beings grown on it must be confiscated as imprescriptible
German property. If the map of Europe is to be re-made in the
antiquary’s vein, let us by no means forget that the Elector of
Brandenburg, for his Prussian dominions, was the vassal of the Polish
republic.^([B])

The more knowing patriots, however, require Alsace and the
German-speaking Lorraine as a “material guarantee” against French
aggression. As this contemptible plea has bewildered many weak-minded
people, we are bound to enter more fully upon it.

There is no doubt that the general configuration of Alsace, as compared
with the opposite bank of the Rhine, and the presence of a large
fortified town like Strasbourg, about halfway between Basle and
Germersheim, very much favour a French invasion of South Germany, while
they offer peculiar difficulties to an invasion of France from South
Germany. There is, further, no doubt that the addition of Alsace and
German-speaking Lorraine would give South Germany a much stronger
frontier, inasmuch as she would then be the master of the crest of the
Vosges mountains in its whole length, and of the fortresses which cover
its northern passes. If Metz were annexed as well, France would
certainly for the moment be deprived of her two principal bases of
operation against Germany, but that would not prevent her from
concentrating a fresh one at Nancy or Verdun. While Germany owns
Coblenz, Mayence [i.e., Mainz], Germersheim, Rastatt, and Ulm, all bases
of operation against France, and plentifully made use of in this war,
with what show of fair play can she begrudge France Strasbourg and Metz,
the only two fortresses of any importance she has on that side?
Moreover, Strasbourg endangers South Germany only while South Germany is
a separate power from North Germany. From 1792 to 1795, South Germany
was never invaded from that direction, because Prussia was a party to
the war against the French Revolution; but as soon as Prussia made a
peace of her own^([C]) in 1795, and left the South to shift for itself,
the invasions of South Germany with Strasbourg as a base began and
continued till 1809. The fact is, a united Germany can always render
Strasbourg and any French army in Alsace innocuous by concentrating all
her troops, as was done in the present war, between Saarlouis and
Landau, and advancing, or accepting battle, on the line of road between
Mayence and Metz. While the mass of the German troops is stationed
there, any French army advancing from Strasbourg into South Germany
would be outflanked, and have its communication threatened. If the
present campaign has proved anything, it is the facility of invading
France from Germany.

But, in good faith, is it not altogether an absurdity and an anachronism
to make military considerations the principle by which the boundaries of
nations are to be fixed? If this rule were to prevail, Austria would
still be entitled to Venetia and the line of the Minicio, and France to
the line of the Rhine, in order to protect Paris, which lies certainly
more open to an attack from the northeast than Berlin does from the
southwest. If limits are to be fixed by military interests, there will
be no end to claims, because every military line is necessarily faulty,
and may be improved by annexing some more outlying territory; and,
moreover, they can never be fixed finally and fairly, because they
always must be imposed by the conqueror upon the conquered, and
consequently carry within them the seed of fresh wars.

Such is the lesson of all history.

Thus with nations as with individuals. To deprive them of the power of
offence, you must deprive them of the means of defence. You must not
only garrote, but murder. If every conqueror took “material guarantees"
for breaking the sinews of a nation, the first Napoleon did so by the
Tilsit Treaty, and the way he executed it against Prussia and the rest
of Germany. Yet, a few years later, his gigantic power split like a
rotten reed upon the German people. What are the “material guarantees”
Prussia, in her wildest dreams, can or dare imposes upon France,
compared to the “material guarantees” the first Napoleon had wrenched
from herself? The result will not prove the less disastrous. History
will measure its retribution, not by the intensity of the square miles
conquered from France, but by the intensity of the crime of reviving, in
the second half of the 19th century, the policy of conquest!

But, say the mouthpieces of Teutonic [German] patriotism, you must not
confound Germans with Frenchmen. What we want is not glory, but safety.
The Germans are an essentially peaceful people. In their sober
guardianship, conquest itself changes from a condition of future war
into a pledge of perpetual peace. Of course, it is not Germans that
invaded France in 1792, for the sublime purpose of bayonetting the
revolution of the 18th century. It is not Germans that befouled their
hands by the subjugation of Italy, the oppressions of Hungary, and the
dismemberment of Poland. Their present military system, which divides
the whole able-bodied male population into two parts – one standing army
on service, and another standing army on furlough, both equally bound in
passive obedience to rulers by divine right – such a military system is,
of course, “a material guarantee,” for keeping the peace and the
ultimate goal of civilizing tendencies! In Germany, as everywhere else,
the sycophants of the powers that be poison the popular mind by the
incense of mendacious self-praise.

Indignant as they pretend to be at the sight of French fortresses in
Metz and Strasbourg, those German patriots see no harm in the vast
system of Moscovite fortifications at Warsaw, Modlin, and Ivangorod [All
strongholds of the Russian Empire] . While gloating at the terrors of
imperialist invasion, they blink at the infamy of autocratic tutelage.

As in 1865, promises were exchanged between Gorchakov and Bismarck. As
Louis Bonaparte flattered himself that the War of 1866, resulting in the
common exhaustion of Austria and Prussia, would make him the supreme
arbiter of Germany, so Alexander [II of Russia] flattered himself that
the War of 1870, resulting in the common exhaustion of Germany and
France, would make him the supreme arbiter of the Western continent. As
the Second Empire thought the North German Confederation incompatible
with its existence, so autocratic Russia must think herself endangered
by a German empire under Prussian leadership. Such is the law of the old
political system. Within its pale the gain of one state is the loss of
the other. The tsar’s paramount influence over Europe roots in his
traditional hold on Germany. At a moment when in Russia herself volcanic
social agencies threaten to shake the very base of autocracy, could the
tsar afford to bear with such a loss of foreign prestige? Already the
Moscovite journals repeat the language of the Bonapartist journals of
the War of 1866. Do the Teuton patriots really believe that liberty and
peace will be guaranteed to Germany by forcing France into the arms of
Russia? If the fortune of her arms, the arrogance of success, and
dynastic intrigue lead Germany to a dismemberment of French territory,
there will then only remain two courses open to her. She must at all
risks become the avowed tool of Russian aggrandizement, or, after some
short respite, make again ready for another “defensive” war, not one of
those new-fangled “localized” wars, but a war of races – a war with the
Slavonic and Roman races.^([D])

The German working class have resolutely supported the war, which it was
not in their power to prevent, as a war for German independence and the
liberation of France and Europe from that pestilential incubus, the
Second Empire. It was the German workmen who, together with the rural
laborers, furnished the sinews and muscles of heroic hosts, leaving
behind their half-starved families. Decimated by the battles abroad,
they will be once more decimated by misery at home. In their turn, they
are now coming forward to ask for “guarantees” – guarantees that their
immense sacrifices have not been bought in vain, that they have
conquered liberty, that the victory over the imperialist armies will
not, as in 1815, be turned into the defeat of the German people^([E]);
and, as the first of these guarantees, they claim an honorable peace for
France, and the recognition of the French republic.

The Central Committee of the German Social-Democratic Workmen’s Party
issued, on September 5, a manifesto, energetically insisting upon these
guarantees.

“We,” they say, “protest against the annexation of Alsace and Lorraine.
And we are conscious of speaking in the name of the German working
class. In the common interest of France and Germany, in the interest of
western civilization against eastern barbarism, the German workmen will
not patiently tolerate the annexation of Alsace and Lorraine.... We
shall faithfully stand by our fellow workmen in all countries for the
common international cause of the proletariat!”

Unfortunately, we cannot feel sanguine of their immediate success. If
the French workmen amidst peace failed to stop the aggressor, are the
German workmen more likely to stop the victor amidst the clamour of
arms? The German workmen’s manifesto demands the extradition of Louis
Bonaparte as a common felon to the French republic. Their rulers are, on
the contrary, already trying hard to restore him to the Tuileries^([F])
as the best man to ruin France. However that may be, history will prove
that the German working class are not made of the same malleable stuff
as the German middle class. They will do their duty.

Like them, we hail the advent of the republic in France, but at the same
time we labor under misgivings which we hope will prove groundless. That
republic has not subverted the throne, but only taken its place, become
vacant. It has been proclaimed, not as a social conquest, but as a
national measure of defence. It is in the hands of a Provisional
Government composed partly of notorious Orleanists, partly of middle
class republicans, upon some of whom the insurrection of June 1848 has
left its indelible stigma. The division of labor amongst the members of
that government looks awkward. The Orleanists have seized the
strongholds of the army and the police, while to the professed
republicans have fallen the talking departments. Some of their acts go
far to show that they have inherited from the empire, not only ruins,
but also its dread of the working class. If eventual impossibilities
are, in wild phraseology, promised in the name of the republic, is it
not with a view to prepare the cry for a “possible” government? Is the
republic, by some of its middle class undertakers, not intended to serve
as a mere stop-gap and bridge over an Orleanist restoration?

The French working class moves, therefore, under circumstances of
extreme difficulty. Any attempt at upsetting the new government in the
present crisis, when the enemy is almost knocking at the doors of Paris,
would be a desperate folly. The French workmen must perform their duties
as citizens; but, at the same time, they must not allow themselves to be
swayed by the national souvenirs of 1792, as the French peasant allowed
themselves to be deluded by the national souvenirs of the First Empire.
They have not to recapitulate the past, but to build up the future. Let
them calmly and resolutely improve the opportunities of republican
liberty, for the work of their own class organization. It will gift them
with fresh herculean powers for the regeneration of France, and our
common task – the emancipation of labor. Upon their energies and wisdom
hinges the fate of the republic.

The English workmen have already taken measures to overcome, by a
wholesome pressure from without, the reluctance of their government to
recognize the French republic.^([G]) The present dilatoriness of the
British government is probably intended to atone for the Anti-Jacobin
war [1792] and the former indecent haste in sanctioning the coup
d’etat.^([H]) The English workmen call also upon their government to
oppose by all its power the dismemberment of France, which a part of the
English press is shameless enough to howl for. It is the same press that
for 20 years deified Louis Bonaparte as the providence of Europe, that
frantically cheered on the slaveholders’ rebellion.^([I]) Now, as then,
it drudges for the slaveholder.

Let the sections of the International Working Men’s Association in every
country stir the working classes to action. If they forsake their duty,
if they remain passive, the present tremendous war will be but the
harbinger of still deadlier international feuds, and lead in every
nation to a renewed triumph over the workman by the lords of the sword,
of the soil, and of capital.

Vive la Republique!

 Footnotes

^([A]) The Holy Roman Empire of the German nation, founded in the 10th
century and constituting a union of feudal principalities and free towns
which recognized the supreme of authority of an emperor.

^([B]) In 1618 the Electorate of Brandenburg united with the Prussian
Dutchy (East Prussia), which had been formed early in the 16th century
out of the Teutonic Order possessions and which was still a feudal
vessel of the Kingdom of Poland. The Elector of Brandenburg, a Prussian
Duke at the same time, remained a Polish vassal until 1657 when, taking
advantage of Poland’s difficulties in the war against Sweden, he secured
sovereign rights to Prussian possessions.

^([C]) The Treaty of Basle concluded by Prussia, a member of the first
anti-French coalition of the European states, with the French Republic
on April 5, 1795.

^([D]) Marx’s clear assessment of Germany’s historical position took
some time to completely fulfill itself, but when it did Germany’s war on
races occurred in full force.

^([E]) Marx refers here to the triumph of feudal reaction in Germany
after the downfall of Napoleon. The feudalist unity of Germany was
restored, the feudal-monarchist system was established in the German
states, which retained all the privileges of the nobility and
intensified the semi-feudal exploitation of the peasantry.

^([F]) The Tuileries Palace in Paris, a residence of Napoleon III.

^([G]) Campaigns by English workers to secure recognition of the French
Republic proclaimed on Sept. 4, 1870. On Sept. 5 a series of meetings
and demonstrations began in London and other big cities, at which
resolutions and petitions were passed demanding that the British
Government immediately recognize the French Republic. The General
Council of the First International took a direct part in the
organization of this movement.

^([H]) Marx is alluding to England’s active part in forming a coalition
of feudal monarchies which started a war against revolutionary France in
1792, and also to the fact that the English oligarchy was the first in
Europe to recognize the Bonapartist regime in France, established as a
result of the coup d’etat, by Louis Bonaparte on December 2, 1851.

^([I]) During the American Civil War (1861-65) between the industrial
North and the slave-owning South, the English bourgeois press took the
side of the South.

Chapter 3
The Third Address
 May, 1871

[France Capitulates & the Government of Thiers]

In September 4, 1870, when the working men of Paris proclaimed the
republic, which was almost instantaneously acclaimed throughout France,
without a single voice of dissent, a cabal of place-hunting barristers,
with Thiers for their statesman, and Trochu for their general, took hold
of the Hotel de Ville. At that time they were imbued with so fanatical a
faith in the mission of Paris to represent France in all epochs of
historical crisis that, to legitimate their usurped titles as governors
of France, they thought it quite sufficient to produce their lapsed
mandates as representatives of Paris.

In our second address on the late war, five days after the rise of these
men, we told you who they were. Yet, in the turmoil of surprise, with
the real leaders of the working class still shut up in Bonapartist
prisons and the Prussians already marching on Paris, Paris bore with
their assumption of power, on the express condition that it was to be
wielded for the single purpose of national defence. Paris, however, was
not to be defended without arming its working class, organizing them
into an effective force, and training their ranks by the war itself. But
Paris armed was the revolution armed. A victory of Paris over the
Prussian aggressor would have been a victory of the French workmen over
the French capitalist and his state parasites. In this conflict between
national duty and class interest, the Government of National Defence did
not hesitate one moment to turn into a Government of National Defection.

The first step they took was to send Thiers on a roving tour to all the
courts of Europe, there to beg mediation by offering the barter of the
republic for a king. Four months after the commencement of the siege [of
Paris], when they thought the opportune moment came for breaking the
first word of capitulation, Trochu, in the presence of Jules Favre, and
others of his colleagues, addressed the assembled mayors of Paris in
these terms:

“The first question put to me by my colleagues on the very evening of
the 4th of September was this: Paris, can it, with any chance of
success, stand a siege by the Prussian army? I did not hesitate to
answer in the negative. Some of my colleagues here present will warrant
the truth of my words and the persistence of my opinion. I told them, in
these very terms, that, under the existing state of things, the attempt
of Paris to hold out a siege by the Prussian army would be a folly.
Without doubt, I added, it would be an heroic folly; but that would be
all.... The events [managed by himself] have not given the lie to my
prevision.”

This nice little speech of Trochu was afterwards published by M. Carbon,
one of the mayors present.

Thus, on the very evening of the proclamation of the republic, Trochu’s
“plan” was known to his colleagues to be the capitulation of Paris. If
national defence has been more than a pretext for the personal
government of Thiers, Favre, and Co., the upstarts of September 4 would
have abdicated on the 5th – would have initiated the Paris people into
Trochu’s “plan,” and called upon them to surrender at once, or to take
their own fate into their own hands. Instead of this, the infamous
impostors resolved upon curing the heroic folly of Paris by a regimen of
famine and broken heads, and to dupe her in the meanwhile by ranting
manifestos, holding forth that Trochu, “the governor of Paris, will
never capitulate", and Jules Favre, the foreign minister, will “not cede
an inch of our territory, nor a stone of our fortresses.”

In a letter to Gambetta, the very same Jules Favre avows that what they
were “defending” against were not the Prussian soldiers, but the working
men of Paris. During the whole continuance of the siege, the Bonapartist
cut-throats, whom Trochu had wisely entrusted with the command of the
Paris army, exchanged, in their intimate correspondence, ribald jokes at
the well-understood mockery of defence. (See, for instance, the
correspondence of Alphonse Simon Guiod, supreme commander of the
artillery of the Army of Defence of Paris and Grand Cross of the Legion
of Honor, to Suzanne, general of division of artillery, a correspondence
published by the Journal officiel of the Commune.) The mask of the true
heroism was at last dropped on January 28, 1871. With the true heroism
of utter self-debasement, the Government of National Defence, in their
capitulation, came out as the government of France by Bismarck’s
prisoners – a part so base that Louis Bonaparte himself had, at Sedan,
shrunk from accepting it. After the events of March 18 on their wild
flight to Versailles, the capitulards left in the hands of Paris the
documentary evidence of their treason, to destroy which, as the Commune
says in its manifesto to the provinces, “those men would not recoil from
battering Paris into a heap of ruins washed by a sea of blood."

To be eagerly bent upon such a consummation, some of the leading members
of the Government of Defence had, besides, most peculiar reasons of
their own.

Shortly after the conclusion of the armistice, M. Milliere, one of the
representatives of Paris to the National Assembly, now shot by express
orders of Jules Favre, published a series of authentic legal documents
in proof that Jules Favre, living in concubinage with the wife of a
drunken resident at Algiers, had, by a most daring concoction of
forgeries, spread over many years, contrived to grasp, in the name of
the children of his adultery, a large succession, which made him a rich
man, and that, in a lawsuit undertaken by the legitimate heirs, he only
escaped exposure by the connivance of the Bonapartist tribunals. As
these dry legal documents were not to be got rid of by any amount of
rhetorical horse-power, Jules Favre, for the first time in his life,
held his tongue, quietly awaiting the outbreak of the civil war, in
order, then, frantically to denounce the people of Paris as a band of
escaped convicts in utter revolt against family, religion, order, and
property. This same forger had hardly got into power, after September 4,
when he sympathetically let loose upon society Pic and Taillefer,
convicted, even under the empire, of forgery in the scandalous affair of
“Etendard.” One of these men, Taillefer, having dared to return to Paris
under the Commune, was at once reinstated in prison; and then Jules
Favre exclaimed, from the tribune of the National Assembly, that Paris
was setting free all her jailbirds!

Ernest Picard, the Joe Miller of the Government of National Defence, who
appointed himself Finance Minister of the republic after having in vain
striven to become home minister of the empire, is the brother of one
Arthur Picard, an individual expelled from the Paris Bourse as a
blackleg (see report of the Prefecture of Police, dated July 13, 1867),
and convicted, on his own confession, of theft of 300,000 francs, while
manager of one of the branches of the Societe Generale,[A] Rue Palestro,
No.5 (see report of the Prefecture of Police, dated December 11, 1868).
This Arthur Picard was made by Ernest Picard the editor of his paper,
l’Electeur Libre. While the common run of stockjobbers were led astray
by the official lies of this finance office paper, Arthur was running
backwards and forwards between the finance office and the Bourse, there
to discount the disasters of the French army. The whole financial
correspondence of that worthy pair of brothers fell into the hands of
the Commune.

Jules Ferry, a penniless barrister before September 4, contrived, as
mayor of Paris during the siege, to job a fortune out of famine. The day
on which he would have to give an account of his maladministration would
be the day of his conviction.

These men, then, could find in the ruins of Paris only their
tickets-of-leave^([1]); they were the very men Bismarck wanted. With the
help of some shuffling of cards, Thiers, hitherto the secret prompter of
the government, now appeared at its head, with the tickets-of-leave men
for his ministers.

Thiers, that monstrous gnome, has charmed the French bourgeoisie for
almost half a century, because he is the most consummate intellectual
expression of their own class corruption. Before he became a statesman,
he had already proved his lying powers as an historian. The chronicle of
his public life is the record of the misfortunes of France. Banded,
before 1830, with the republicans, he slipped into office under Louis
Philippe by betraying his protector Lafitte, ingratiating himself with
the king by exciting mob riots against the clergy, during which the
church of Saint Germain l’Auxerrois and the Archbishop’s palace were
plundered, and by acting the minister-spy upon, and the jail-accoucheur
of the Duchess de Berry.^([B]) The massacre of the republicans in the
Rue Transnonian, and the subsequent infamous laws of September against
the press and the right of association, were his work.^([C]) Reappearing
as the chief of the cabinet in March 1840, he astonished France with his
plan for fortifying France.^([D]) To the republicans, who denounced this
plan as a sinister plot against the liberty of Paris, he replied from
the tribune of the Chamber of Deputies:

“What! To fancy that any works of fortification could ever endanger
liberty! And first of all you calumniate any possible government in
supposing that it could some day attempt to maintain itself by
bombarding the capital; [...] but that the government would be a hundred
times more impossible after its victory than before.”

Indeed, no government would ever have dared to bombard Paris from the
forts, save that government which had previously surrendered these forts
to the Prussians.

When King Bomba [Ferdinand II of Spain] tried his hand at Palermo, in
January 1848, Thiers, then long since out of office, again rose in the
Chamber of Deputies:

“You know, gentlemen, what is happening at Palermo. You, all of you,
shake with horror [in the parliamentary sense] on hearing that during 48
hours a large town has been bombarded – by whom? Was it a foreign enemy
exercising the rights of war? No, gentlemen, it was by its own
government. And why? Because the unfortunate town demanded its rights.
Well, then, for the demand of its rights it has got 48 hours of
bombardment.... Allow me to appeal to the opinion of Europe. It is doing
a service to mankind to arise, and to make reverberate, from what is
perhaps the greatest tribune in Europe, some words [indeed words] of
indignation against such acts.... When the Regent Espartero, who had
rendered services to his country [which M. Thiers never did] intended
bombarding Barcelona, in order to suppress its insurrection, there arose
from all parts of the world a general outcry of indignation.”

Eighteen months afterwards, M. Thiers was amongst the fiercest defenders
of the bombardment of Rome by a French army.^([E]) In fact, the fault of
King Bomba seems to have consisted in this only – that he limited his
bombardment to 48 hours.

A few days before the February Revolution, fretting at the long exile
from place and pelf to which Guizot had condemned him, and sniffing in
the air the scent of an approaching popular commotion, Thiers, in that
pseudo-heroic style which won him the nickname Mirabeau-mouche [Mirabeau
the fly], declared, to the Chamber of Deputies:

“I am of the party of revolution, not only in France, but in Europe. I
wish the government of the revolution to remain in the hands of moderate
men... but if that government should fall into the hand of ardent minds,
even into those of radicals, I shall, for all that, not desert my cause.
I shall always be of the party of the revolution.”

The February Revolution came. Instead of displacing the Guizot Cabinet
by the Thiers Cabinet, as the little man had dreamt, it superseded Louis
Philippe by the republic. On the first day of the popular victory, he
carefully hid himself, forgetting that the contempt of the working men
screened him from their hatred. Still, with his legendary courage, he
continued to shy the public stage, until the June [1848] massacres had
cleared it for his sort of action. Then he became the leading mind of
the “Party of Order”^([F]) and its parliamentary republic, that
anonymous interregnum, in which all the rival factions of the ruling
class conspired together to crush the people, and conspired against each
other to restore to each of them its own monarchy. Then, as now, Thiers
denounced the republicans as the only obstacle to the consolidation of
the republic; then, as now, he spoke to the republic as the hangman
spoke to Don Carlos: “I shall assassinate thee, but for thy own good.”
Now, as then, he will have to exclaim on the day after his victory:
L’Empire est fait – the empire is consummated.

Despite his hypocritical homilies about the necessary liberties and his
personal grudge against Louis Bonaparte, who had made a dupe of him, and
kicked out parliamentarism – and, outside of its factitious atmosphere,
the little man is conscious of withering into nothingness – he had a
hand in all the infamies of the Second Empire, from the occupation of
Rome by French troops to the war with Prussia, which he incited by his
fierce invective against German unity – not as a cloak of Prussian
despotism, but as an encroachment upon the vested right of France in
German disunion. Fond of brandishing, with his dwarfish arms in the face
of Europe, the sword of the first Napoleon, whose historical shoeblack
he had become, his foreign policy always culminated in the utter
humiliation of France – from the London convention^([G]) of 1840 to the
Paris capitulation of 1871, and the present civil war, where he hounds
on the prisoners of Sedan and Metz^([H]) against Paris by special
permission of Bismarck.

Despite his versatility of talent and shiftiness of purpose, this man
has his whole lifetime been wedded to the most fossil routine. It is
self-evident that to him the deeper undercurrents of modern society
remained forever hidden; but even the most palpable changes on its
surface were abhorrent to a brain (all the vitality of which) had fled
to the tongue. Thus, he never tired of denouncing as a sacrilege any
deviation from the old French protective system.

When a minister of Louis Philippe, he railed at railways as a wild
chimera; and when in opposition under Louis Bonaparte, he branded as a
profanation every attempt to reform the rotten French army system. Never
in his long political career has he been guilty of a single – even the
smallest – measure of any practical use. Thiers was consistent only in
his greed for wealth and his hatred of the men that produce it. Having
entered his first ministry, under Louis Philippe, poor as Job, he left
it a millionaire. His last ministry under the same king (of March 1,
1840) exposed him to public taunts of peculation in the Chamber of
Deputies, to which he was content to reply by tears – a commodity he
deals in as freely as Jules Favre, or any other crocodile. At Bordeaux,
his first measure for saving France from impending financial ruin was to
endow himself with three millions a year, the first and the last word of
the “Economical Republic,” the vista of which he had opened to his Paris
electors in 1869. One of his former colleagues of the Chamber of
Deputies of 1830, himself a capitalist and, nevertheless, a devoted
member of the Paris Commune, M. Beslay, lately addressed Thiers thus in
a public placard:

“The enslavement of labor by capital has always been the cornerstone of
your policy, and from the very day you saw the Republic of Labor
installed at the Hotel de Ville, you have never ceased to cry out to
France: ‘These are criminals!’”

A master in small state roguery, a virtuoso in perjury and treason, a
craftsman in all the petty strategems, cunning devices, and base
perfidies of parliamentary warfare; never scrupling, when out of office,
to fan a revolution, and to stifle it in blood when at the helm of the
state; with class prejudices standing him in the place of ideas, and
vanity in the place of a heart; his private life as infamous as his
public life is odious – even now, when playing the part of a French
Sulla, he cannot help setting off the abomination of his deeds by the
ridicule of his ostentation.

The capitulation of Paris, by surrendering to Prussia not only Paris,
but all France, closed the long-continued intrigues of treason with the
enemy, which the usurpers of September 4 had begun, as Trochu himself
said, on the very same day. On the other hand, it initiated the civil
war they were now to wage, with the assistance of Prussia, against the
republic and Paris. The trap was laid in the very terms of the
capitulation. At that time, above one-third of the territory was in the
hands of the enemy, the capital was cut off from the provinces, all
communications were disorganized. To elect, under such circumstances, a
real representation of France was impossible, unless ample time were
given for preparation. In view of this, the capitulation stipulated that
a National Assembly must be elected within eight days; so that in many
parts of France the news of the impending election arrived on its eve
only. This assembly, moreover, was, by an express clause of the
capitulation, to be elected for the sole purpose of deciding on peace or
war, and, eventually, to conclude a treaty of peace. The population
could not but feel that the terms of the armistice rendered the
continuation of the war impossible, and that for sanctioning the peace
imposed by Bismarck, the worst men in France were the best. But not
content with these precautions, Thiers even before the secret of the
armistice had been broached to Paris, set out for an electioneering tour
through the provinces, there to galvanize back into life the Legitimist
party, which now, along with the Orleanists, had to take the place of
the then impossible Bonapartists. He was not afraid of them. Impossible
as a government of modern France, and, therefore, contemptible as
rivals, what party were more eligible as tools of counter-revolution
than the party whose action, in the words of Thiers himself (Chamber of
Deputies, January 5, 1833), “Had always been confined to the three
resources of foreign invasion, civil war, and anarchy”? They verily
believed in the advent of their long-expected retrospective millennium.
There were the heels of foreign invasion trampling upon France; there
was the downfall of an empire, and the captivity of Bonaparte; and there
they were themselves. The wheel of history had evidently rolled back to
stop at the “Chambers introuvable” of 1816.^([I]) In the assemblies of
the republic, 1848 to 1851, they had been represented by their educated
and trained parliamentary champions; it was the rank-and-file of the
party which now rushed in – all the Pourceaugnacs of France. [a
character in one of Molière’s comedies, typifying the dull-witted,
narrow-minded petty landed gentry.]

As soon as this Assembly of “Rurals"^([J]) had met at Bordeaux, Thiers
made it clear to them that the peace preliminaries must be assented to
at once, without even the honors of a parliamentary debate, as the only
conditions on which Prussia would permit them to open the war against
the republic and Paris, its stronghold. The counter-revolution had, in
fact, no time to lose. The Second Empire had more than doubled the
national debt, and plunged all the large towns into heavy municipal
debts. The war had fearfully swelled the liabilities, and mercilessly
ravaged the resources of the nation. To complete the ruin, the Prussian
Shylock was there with his bond for the keep of half a million of his
soldiers on French soil, his indemnity for five milliards^([K]), and
interest at 5 per cent on the unpaid instalments thereof. Who was to pay
this bill? It was only by the violent overthrow of the republic that the
appropriators of wealth could hope to shift onto the shoulders of its
producers the cost of a war which they, the appropriators, had
themselves originated. Thus, the immense ruin of France spurred on these
patriotic representatives of land and capital, under the very eyes and
patronage of the invader, to graft upon the foreign war a civil war – a
slaveholders’ rebellion.

There stood in the way of this conspiracy one great obstacle – Paris. To
disarm Paris was the first condition of success. Paris was therefore
summoned by Thiers to surrender its arms. Then Paris was exasperated by
the frantic anti-republican demonstrations of the “Rural” Assembly and
by Thiers’ own equivocations about the legal status of the republic; by
the threat to decapitate and decapitalize Paris; the appointment of
Orleanist ambassadors; Dufaure’s laws on over-due commercial bills and
house rents^([L]), inflicting ruin on the commerce and industry of
Paris; Pouyer-Quertier’s tax of two centimes upon every copy of every
imaginable publication; the sentences of death against Blanqui and
Flourens; the suppression of the republican journals; the transfer of
the National Assembly to Versailles; the renewal of the state of siege
declared by Palikao, and expired on September 4; the appointment of
Vinoy, the Décembriseur^([M]), as governor of Paris – of Valentin, the
imperialist gendarme, as its prefect of police – and of D’Aurelles de
Paladine, the Jesuit general, as the commander-in-chief of its National
Guard.

And now we have to address a question to M. Thiers and the men of
national defence, his under-strappers. It is known that, through the
agency of M. Pouyer-Quertier, his finance ministers, Thiers had
contracted a loan of two milliards. Now, is it true or not –

1. That the business was so managed that a consideration of several
hundred millions was secured for the private benefit of Thiers, Jules
Favre, Ernest Picard, Pouyer-Quertier, and Jules Simon? and –

2. That no money was to be paid down until after the “pacification” of
Paris?^([N])

At all events, there must have been something very pressing in the
matter, for Thiers and Jules Favre, in the name of the majority of the
Bordeaux Assembly, unblushingly solicited the immediate occupation of
Paris by Prussian troops. Such, however, was not the game of Bismarck,
as he sneeringly, and in public, told the admiring Frankfort philistines
on his return to Germany.

 Footnotes

⁽¹⁾ In England common criminals are often discharged on parole after
serving the greater part of their term, and are placed under police
surveillance. On such discharge they receive a certificate called
ticket-of-leave, their possessor is being referred to as
ticket-of-leave-men.

^([A]) Société Générale du Credit Mobilier – A large French joint-stock
bank founded in 1852. Its main source of income was speculation in
securities. The bank was closely linked with the government circles of
the Second Empire. In 1867 it went bankrupt and was liquidated in 1871.

^([B]) On February 14 and 15, 1831 the Paris mob plundered the church of
St. Germain l’ Auxerroisand Archbishop Quélen’s palace in protest
against the Legitimist demonstration during the Requiem mass for the
Duke de Barry. Thiers, who was present among the rioting crowd while it
was committing excesses in the church and in the Archbishop’s palace,
persuaded the French National Guards not to interfere.

In 1832, by the order of Thiers, who was at that time minister of the
Interior, the Duchesse de Berry (mother of the Comte de Chambord) – the
Legitimist pretender to the French throne – was arrested and subjected
to a humiliating medical examination aimed at giving publicity to her
secret marriage and in this way ruling her political career.

^([C]) An allusion to the ignominious role of Thiers, then Minister of
the Interior, in suppressing the people’s insurrection in Paris against
the July monarchy on April 13-14, 1834. The insurrection was put down
with savage brutality by the military who, for example, massacred the
inhabitants of one of the houses on Rue Transnonain.

September Laws – reactionary laws against the press introduced by the
French Government in September 1835. They provided for imprisonment and
large fines for publications criticizing the existing social and
political system.

^([D]) In January 1841, Thiers submitted to the Chamber of Deputies a
plan for building a range of military fortifications around Paris.
Revolutionary-democratic sections saw this move as a preparatory step
for the crushing of popular demonstrations. The plan provided for the
building of particularly strong fortifications in the vicinity of the
workers districts.

^([E]) In April 1849 France, in conjunction with Austria and Naples,
organized an intervention campaign against the republic of Rome in order
to crush it and restore the pope’s temporal power. French troops
severely bombarded Rome. Despite heroic resistance, the Republic was
crushed and Rome occupied by French troops.

^([F]) Party of Order – A party of the influential conservative
bourgeoisie founded in 1848. It was a coalition of the two French
monarchist factions – the Legitimists and Orleanists; from 1849 until
the coup d’etat of December 2, 1851, it held the leading position in the
Legislative Assembly of the Second Republic.

^([G]) On July 15, 1840, England, Russia, Prussia, Austria and Turkey
signed the London Convention, without the participation of France, on
rendering aid to the Turkish Sultan against the Egyptian ruler Mohammed
Ali, who had the support of France. As a result, a threat of war arose
between France and the coalition of European powers, but King Louis
Philippe did not dare begin hostilities and abandoned his support of
Mohammed Ali.

^([H]) In order to suppress the Paris Commune Thiers appealed to
Bismarck for permission to supplement the Versailles Army with French
prisoners of war, most of whom had been serving in the armies that
surrendered at Sedan and Metz.

^([I]) Chamber of Deputies in France in 1815 and 1816 (during the early
years of the Restoration), which consisted of extreme reactionaries.

^([J]) Landlord Chamber, the Assembly of “Rurals” – A nickname of the
National Assembly of 1871, which met in Bordeaux and was largely made up
of reactionary monarchists, provincial landlords, officials, rentiers
and traders “elected” in rural districts. There were about 430
monarchists among the Assembly’s 630 deputies.

^([K]) The preliminary peace treaty between France and Germany signed at
Versailles on February 26, 1871 by Thiers and Jules Favre, on the one
hand, and Bismarck, on the other. According to the terms of this treaty,
France ceded Alsace and East Lorraine to Germany and paid it indemnities
to the sum of 5 billion francs. The final peace treaty was signed in
Frankfort-on-Main on May 10, 1871.

^([L]) On March 10, 1871, the National Assembly passed a law on the
deferred payment of overdue bills; under this law the payment of debts
on obligations concluded between August 13 and November 12, 1870 could
be deferred. Thus, law led to the bankruptcy of many petty bourgeoisie.

^([M]) Décembriseur – a participant in the Bonapartist coup d’etat of
December 2, 1851 and supporter of acts in the spirit of this coup.

^([N]) According to the newspapers, the internal loan, which the Thiers
government wanted to float, gave Thiers and members of his government
over 300 million francs “commission.” On June 20, 1871, after the
suppression of the Paris Commune, the law on the loan was passed.

Chapter 4
The Third Address
 May, 1871

[Paris Workers’ Revolution Thiers’ Reactionary Massacres]

Armed Paris was the only serious obstacle in the way of the
counter-revolutionary conspiracy. Paris was, therefore, to be disarmed.

On this point, the Bordeaux Assembly [National Assembly] was sincerity
itself. If the roaring rant of its Rurals had not been audible enough,
the surrender of Paris by Thiers to the tender mercies of the
triumvirate of Vinoy the Decembriseur, Valentin the Bonapartist
gendarme, and Aurelles de Paladine the Jesuit general, would have cut
off even the last subterfuge of doubt.

But while insultingly exhibiting the true purpose of the disarmament of
Paris, the conspirators asked her to lay down her arms on a pretext
which was the most glaring, the most barefaced of lies. The artillery of
the Paris National Guard, said Thiers, belonged to the state, and to the
state it must be returned. The fact was this: From the very day of the
capitulation, by which Bismarck’s prisoners had signed the surrender of
France, but reserved to themselves a numerous bodyguard for the express
purpose of cowing Paris, Paris stood on the watch. The National Guard
reorganized themselves and entrusted their supreme control to a Central
Committee elected by their whole body, save some fragments of the old
Bonapartist formations. On the eve of the entrance of the Prussians into
Paris, the Central Committee took measures for the removal to
Montmartre, Belleville, and La Villette, of the cannon and mitrailleuses
treacherously abandoned by the capitulards in and about the very
quarters the Prussians were to occupy. That artillery had been furnished
by the subscriptions of the National Guard. As their private property,
it was officially recognized in the capitulation of January 28, and on
that very title exempted from the general surrender, into the hands of
the conqueror, or arms belonging to the government. And Thiers was so
utterly destitute of even the flimsiest pretext for initiating the war
against Paris, that he had to resort to the flagrant lie of the
artillery of the National Guard being state property!

The seizure of her artillery was evidently but to serve as the
preliminary to the general disarmament of Paris, and, therefore, of the
Revolution of September 4. But that revolution had become the legal
status of France. The republic, its work, was recognized by the
conqueror in the terms of the capitulation. After the capitulation, it
was acknowledged by all foreign powers, and in its name, the National
Assembly had been summoned. The Paris working men’s revolution of
September 4 was the only legal title of the National Assembly seated at
Bordeaux, and of its executive. Without it, the National Assembly would
at once have to give way to the Corps Legislatif elected in 1869 by
universal suffrage under French, not under Prussian, rule, and forcibly
dispersed by the arm of the revolution. Thiers and his ticket-of-leave
men would have had to capitulate for safe conducts signed by Louis
Bonaparte, to save them from a voyage to Cayenne[A]. The National
Assembly, with its power of attorney to settle the terms of peace with
Prussia, was but an incident of that revolution, the true embodiment of
which was still armed Paris, which had initiated it, undergone for it a
five-months’ siege, with its horrors of famine, and made her prolonged
resistance, despite Trochu’s plan, the basis of an obstinate war of
defence in the provinces. And Paris was now either to lay down her arms
at the insulting behest of the rebellious slaveholders of Bordeaux, and
acknowledge that her Revolution of September 4 meant nothing but a
simple transfer of power from Louis Bonaparte to his royal rivals; or
she had to stand forward as the self-sacrificing champion of France,
whose salvation from ruin and whose regeneration were impossible without
the revolutionary overthrow of the political and social conditions that
had engendered the Second Empire, and under its fostering care, matured
into utter rottenness. Paris, emaciated by a five-months’ famine, did
not hesitate one moment. She heroically resolved to run all the hazards
of a resistance against French conspirators, even with Prussian cannon
frowning upon her from her own forts. Still, in its abhorrence of the
civil war into which Paris was to be goaded, the Central Committee
continued to persist in a merely defensive attitude, despite the
provocations of the Assembly, the usurpations of the Executive, and the
menacing concentration of troops in and around Paris.

Thiers opened the civil war by sending Vinoy, at the head of a multitude
of sergents-de-ville, and some regiments of the line, upon a nocturnal
expedition against Montmartre, there to seize, by surprise, the
artillery of the National Guard. It is well known how this attempt broke
down before the resistance of the National Guard and the fraternization
of the line with the people. Aurelles de Paldine had printed beforehand
his bulletin of victory, and Thiers held ready the placards announcing
his measures of coup d’etat. Now these had to be replaced by Thiers’
appeals, imparting his magnanimous resolve to leave the National Guard
in the possession of their arms, with which, he said, he felt sure they
would rally round the government against the rebels. Out of 300,000
National guards, only 300 responded to this summons to rally around
little Thiers against themselves. The glorious working men’s Revolution
of March 18 took undisputed sway of Paris. The Central Committee was its
provisional government. Europe seemed, for a moment, to doubt whether
its recent sensational performances of state and war had any reality in
them, or whether they were the dreams of a long bygone past.

From March 18 to the entrance of the Versailles troops into Paris, the
proletarian revolution remained so free from the acts of violence in
which the revolutions – and still more the counter-revolutions – of the
“better classes” abound, that no facts were left to its opponents to cry
out about, but the executions of Generals Lecomte and Clement Thomas,
and the affair of the Place Vendome.

One of the Bonapartist officers engaged in the nocturnal attempt against
Montmartre, General Lecomte, had four times ordered the 81st line
regiment to fire at an unarmed gathering in the Place Pigalle, and on
their refusal fiercely insulted them. Instead of shooting women and
children, his own men shot him. The inveterate habits acquired by the
soldiery under the training of the enemies of the working class are, of
course, not likely to change the very moment these soldiers change
sides. The same men executed Clement Thomas.

“General” Clement Thomas, a malcontent ex-quartermaster-sergeant, had,
in the latter times of Louis Philippe’s reign, enlisted at the office of
the republican newspaper Le National, there to serve in the double
capacity of responsible man-of-straw (gerant responsable) and of
duelling bully to that very combative journal. After the February
Revolution, the men of the National having got into power, they
metamorphosed this old quarter-master-sergeant into a general on the eve
of the butchery of June – of which he, like Jules Favre, was one of the
sinister plotters, and became one of the most dastardly executioners.
Then he and his generalship disappeared for a long time, to again rise
to the surface on November 1, 1870. The day before, the Government of
National Defence, caught at the Hotel de Ville, had solemnly pledged
their parole to Blanqui, Flourens, and other representatives of the
working class, to abdicate their usurped power into the hands of a
commune to be freely elected by Paris.^([B]) Instead of keeping their
word, they let loose on Paris the Bretons of Trochu, who now replaced
the Corsicans of Bonaparte.^([C]) General Tamisier alone, refusing to
sully his name by such a breach of faith, resigned the
commandership-in-chief of the National Guard, and in his place Clement
Thomas for once became again a general. During the whole of his tenure
of command, he made war, not upon the Prussians, but upon the Paris
National Guard. He prevented their general armament, pitted the
bourgeois battalions against the working men’s battalions, weeded out
officers hostile to Trochu’s “plan,” and disbanded, under the stigma of
cowardice, the very same proletarian battalions whose heroism has now
astonished their most inveterate enemies. Clement Thomas felt quite
proud of having reconquered his June pre-eminence as the personal enemy
of the working class of Paris. Only a few days before March 18, he laid
before the War Minister, Leflo, a plan of his own for “finishing off la
fine fleur [the cream] of the Paris canaille.” After Vinoy’s rout, he
must needs appear upon the scene of action in the quality of an amateur
spy. The Central Committee and the Paris working men were as much
responsible for the killing of Clement Thomas and Lecomte as the
Princess of Wales for the fate of the people crushed to death on the day
of her entrance into London.

The massacre of unarmed citizens in Place Vendome is a myth which M.
Thiers and the Rurals persistently ignored in the Assembly, entrusting
its propagation exclusively to the servants’ hall of European
journalism. “The men of order,” the reactionists of Paris, trembled at
the victory of March 18. To them, it was the signal of popular
retribution at last arriving. The ghosts of the victims assassinated at
their hands from the days of June 1848, down to January 22, 1871,^([D])
arose before their faces. Their panic was their only punishment. Even
the sergents-de-ville, instead of being disarmed and locked up, as ought
to have been done, had the gates of Paris flung open wide for their safe
retreat to Versailles. The men of order were left not only unharmed, but
allowed to rally and quietly seize more than one stronghold in the very
centre of Paris. This indulgence of the Central Committee – this
magnanimity of the armed working men – so strangely at variance with the
habits of the “Party of Order,” the latter misinterpreted as mere
symptoms of conscious weakness. Hence their silly plan to try, under the
cloak of an unarmed demonstration, what Vinoy had failed to perform with
his cannon and mitrailleuses. On March 22, a riotous mob of swells
started from the quarters of luxury, all the petits creves in their
ranks, and at their head the notorious familiars of the empire – the
Heeckeren, Coetlogon, Henri de Pene, etc. Under the cowardly pretence of
a pacific demonstration, this rabble, secretly armed with the weapons of
the bravo [i.e. hired assassin], fell into marching order, ill-treated
and disarmed the detached patrols and sentries of the National Guard
they met with on their progress, and, on debouching from the Rue de la
Paix, with the cry of “Down with the Central Committee! Down with the
assassins! The National Assembly forever!” attempted to break through
the line drawn up there, and thus to carry by surprise the headquarters
of the National Guard in the Place Vendome. In reply to their
pistol-shots, the regular sommations (the French equivalent of the
English Riot Act)^([E]) were made, and, proving ineffective, fire was
commanded by the general [Bergeret] of the National Guard. One volley
dispersed into wild flight the silly coxcombs, who expected that the
mere exhibition of their “respectability” would have the same effect
upon the Revolution of Paris as Joshua’s trumpets upon the walls of
Jericho. The runaways left behind them two National Guards killed, nine
severely wounded (among them a member of the Central Committee
[Maljournal]), and the whole scene of their exploit strewn with
revolvers, daggers, and sword-canes, in evidence of the “unarmed”
character of their “pacific” demonstration. When, on June 13, 1849, the
National Guard made a really pacific demonstration in protest against
the felonious assault of French troops upon Rome, Changarnier, then
general of the Party of Order, was acclaimed by the National Assembly,
and especially by M. Thiers, as the savior of society, for having
launched his troops from all sides upon these unarmed men, to shoot and
sabre them down, and to trample them under their horses’ feet. Paris,
then was placed under a state of siege. Dufaure hurried through the
Assembly new laws of repression. New arrests, new proscriptions – a new
reign of terror set in. But the lower orders manage these things
otherwise. The Central Committee of 1871 simply ignored the heroes of
the “pacific demonstration"; so much so, that only two days later, they
were enabled to muster under Admiral Saisset, for that armed
demonstration, crowned by the famous stampede to Versailles. In their
reluctance to continue the civil war opened by Thiers’ burglarious
attempt on Montmartre, the Central Committee made themselves, this time,
guilty of a decisive mistake in not at once marching upon Versailles,
then completely helpless, and thus putting an end to the conspiracies of
Thiers and his Rurals. Instead of this, the Party of Order was again
allowed to try its strength at the ballot box, on March 26, the day of
the election of the Commune. Then, in the mairies of Paris, they
exchanged bland words of conciliation with their too generous
conquerors, muttering in their hearts solemn vows to exterminate them in
due time.

Now, look at the reverse of the medal. Thiers opened his second campaign
against Paris in the beginning of April. The first batch of Parisian
prisoners brought into Versailles was subjected to revolting atrocities,
while Ernest Picard, with his hands in his trousers’ pockets, strolled
about jeering them, and while Mesdames Thiers and Favre, in the midst of
their ladies of honor (?) applauded, from the balcony, the outrages of
the Versailles mob. The captured soldiers of the line were massacred in
cold blood; our brave friend, General Duval, the iron-founder, was shot
without any form of trial. Galifet, the kept man of his wife, so
notorious for her shameless exhibitions at the orgies of the Second
Empire, boasted in a proclamation of having commanded the murder of a
small troop of National Guards, with their captain and lieutenant,
surprised and disarmed by his Chasseurs. Vinoy, the runaway, was
appointed by Thiers, Grand Cross of the Legion of Honor, for his general
order to shoot down every soldier of the line taken in the ranks of the
Federals. Desmaret, the Gendarme, was decorated for the treacherous
butcher-like chopping in pieces of the high-souled and chivalrous
Flourens, who had saved the heads of the Government of Defence on
October 31, 1870.^([F]) “The encouraging particulars” of his
assassination were triumphantly expatiated upon by Thiers in the
National Assembly. With the elated vanity of a parliamentary Tom Thumb
permitted to play the part of a Tamerlane, he denied the rebels the
right of neutrality for ambulances. Nothing more horrid than that monkey
allowed for a time to give full fling to his tigerish instincts, as
foreseen by Voltaire.[Candide, Ch. 22](See news articles)

After the decree of the Commune of April 7, ordering reprisals and
declaring it to be the duty “to protect Paris against the cannibal
exploits of the Versailles banditti, and to demand an eye for an eye, a
tooth for a tooth,” ^([G]) Thiers did not stop the barbarous treatment
of prisoners, moreover, insulting them in his bulletins as follows:
“Never have more degraded countenances of a degraded democracy met the
afflicted gazes of honest men” – honest, like Thiers himself and his
ministerial ticket-of-leave men. Still, the shooting of prisoners was
suspended for a time. Hardly, however, had Thiers and his Decembrist
generals [of the December 2, 1851 coup by Louis Bonaparte] become aware
that the Communal decree of reprisals was but an empty threat, that even
their gendarme spies caught in Paris under the disguise of National
Guards, that even sergents-de-ville, taken with incendiary shells upon
them, were spared – when the wholesale shooting of prisoners was resumed
and carried on uninterruptedly to the end. Houses to which National
Guards had fled were surrounded by gendarmes, inundated with petroleum
(which here occurs for the first time in this war), and then set fire
to, the charred corpses being afterwards brought out by the ambulance of
the Press at the Ternes. Four National Guards having surrendered to a
troop of mounted Chasseurs at Belle Epine, on April 25, were afterwards
shot down, one after another, by the captain, a worthy man of
Gallifet’s. One of his four victims, left for dead, Scheffer, crawled
back to the Parisian outposts, and deposed to this fact before a
commission of the Commune. When Tolain interpellated the War Minister
upon the report of this commission, the Rurals drowned his voice and
forbade Leflo to answer. It would be an insult to their “glorious” army
to speak of its deeds. The flippant tone in which Thiers’ bulletin
announced the bayoneting of the Federals, surprised asleep at Moulin
Saquet, and the wholesale fusillades at Clamart shocked the nerves even
of the not over-sensitive London Times. But it would be ludicrous today
to attempt recounting the merely preliminary atrocities committed by the
bombarders of Paris and the fomenters of a slaveholders’ rebellion
protected by foreign invasion. Amidst all these horrors, Thiers,
forgetful of his parliamentary laments on the terrible responsibility
weighing down his dwarfish shoulders, boasts in his bulletins that
l’Assemblee siege paisiblement (the Assembly continues meeting in
peace), and proves by his constant carousals, now with Decembrist
generals, now with German princes, that his digestion is not troubled in
the least, not even by the ghosts of Lecomte and Clement Thomas.

Footnotes

^([A]) A town in French Guiana (Northern South America), penal
settlement and place of exile.

^([B]) On October 31, 1870, upon the receipt of news that the Government
of National Defense had decided to start negotiations with the
Prussians, the Paris workers and revolutionary sections of the National
Guard rose up in revolt. They seized the town hall and set up their
revolutionary government – the Committee of Public Safety, headed by
Blanqui. Under pressure from the workers the Government of National
Defense promised to resign and schedule national elections to the
Commune for November 1. The government then, with the aid of some loyal
battalions of the National Guard, seized the town hall by force of arms
and re-established its domination.

^([C]) Bretons – Breton Mobile Guard which Trochu used as gendarmes to
put down the revolutionary movement in Paris.
Corsicans – constituted a considerable part of the gendarmes corps
during the Second Empire.

^([D]) On January 22, 1871, the Paris proletariat and the National
Guards held a revolutionary demonstration initiated by the Blanquists.
They demanded the overthrow of the government and the establishment of a
Commune. By order of the Government of National Defense, the Breton
Mobile Guard, which was defending the town hall, opened fire on the
demonstrators. After massacring the workers, the government began
preparations to surrender Paris to the Germans.

^([E]) Sommations (a preliminary demand to disburse) – under the laws of
most bourgeois states, this demand is repeated three times, following
which the armed police are entitled to resort to force. The Riot Act was
introduced in England in 1715. It prohibited “rebel gatherings” of more
than 12 people in a group, giving the authorities the right to use force
if the crowd did not disperse within an hour after the reading out of
the sommations three times.

^([F]) On October 31, Flourens prevented the members of the Government
of National Defense from being shot, as had been demanded by one of the
insurrectionists.

^([G]) A reference to the decree on hostages adopted by the Commune on
April 5, 1871. (Marx gives the date of its publication in the English
press.) Under this decree, all persons found guilty of being in contact
with Versailles were declared hostages. By this decree the Commune
sought to prevent Communards from being shot by the Versaillists.

Chapter 5
The Third Address
 May, 1871

[The Paris Commune]

On the dawn of March 18, Paris arose to the thunder-burst of “Vive la
Commune!” What is the Commune, that sphinx so tantalizing to the
bourgeois mind?

“The proletarians of Paris,” said the Central Committee in its manifesto
of March 18, “amidst the failures and treasons of the ruling classes,
have understood that the hour has struck for them to save the situation
by taking into their own hands the direction of public affairs.... They
have understood that it is their imperious duty, and their absolute
right, to render themselves masters of their own destinies, by seizing
upon the governmental power.”

But the working class cannot simply lay hold of the ready-made state
machinery, and wield it for its own purposes.

The centralized state power, with its ubiquitous organs of standing
army, police, bureaucracy, clergy, and judicature – organs wrought after
the plan of a systematic and hierarchic division of labor – originates
from the days of absolute monarchy, serving nascent middle class society
as a mighty weapon in its struggle against feudalism. Still, its
development remained clogged by all manner of medieval rubbish,
seignorial rights, local privileges, municipal and guild monopolies, and
provincial constitutions. The gigantic broom of the French Revolution of
the 18th century swept away all these relics of bygone times, thus
clearing simultaneously the social soil of its last hinderances to the
superstructure of the modern state edifice raised under the First
Empire, itself the offspring of the coalition wars of old semi-feudal
Europe against modern France.

During the subsequent regimes, the government, placed under
parliamentary control – that is, under the direct control of the
propertied classes – became not only a hotbed of huge national debts and
crushing taxes; with its irresistible allurements of place, pelf, and
patronage, it became not only the bone of contention between the rival
factions and adventurers of the ruling classes; but its political
character changed simultaneously with the economic changes of society.
At the same pace at which the progress of modern industry developed,
widened, intensified the class antagonism between capital and labor, the
state power assumed more and more the character of the national power of
capital over labor, of a public force organized for social enslavement,
of an engine of class despotism.

After every revolution marking a progressive phase in the class
struggle, the purely repressive character of the state power stands out
in bolder and bolder relief. The Revolution of 1830, resulting in the
transfer of government from the landlords to the capitalists,
transferred it from the more remote to the more direct antagonists of
the working men. The bourgeois republicans, who, in the name of the
February Revolution, took the state power, used it for the June [1848]
massacres, in order to convince the working class that “social” republic
means the republic entrusting their social subjection, and in order to
convince the royalist bulk of the bourgeois and landlord class that they
might safely leave the cares and emoluments of government to the
bourgeois “republicans.”

However, after their one heroic exploit of June, the bourgeois
republicans had, from the front, to fall back to the rear of the “Party
of Order” – a combination formed by all the rival fractions and factions
of the appropriating classes. The proper form of their joint-stock
government was the parliamentary republic, with Louis Bonaparte for its
president. Theirs was a regime of avowed class terrorism and deliberate
insult towards the “vile multitude.”

If the parliamentary republic, as M. Thiers said, “divided them [the
different fractions of the ruling class] least", it opened an abyss
between that class and the whole body of society outside their spare
ranks. The restraints by which their own divisions had under former
regimes still checked the state power, were removed by their union; and
in view of the threatening upheaval of the proletariat, they now used
that state power mercilessly and ostentatiously as the national war
engine of capital against labor.

In their uninterrupted crusade against the producing masses, they were,
however, bound not only to invest the executive with continually
increased powers of repression, but at the same time to divest their own
parliamentary stronghold – the National Assembly – one by one, of all
its own means of defence against the Executive. The Executive, in the
person of Louis Bonaparte, turned them out. The natural offspring of the
“Party of Order” republic was the Second Empire.

The empire, with the coup d’etat for its birth certificate, universal
suffrage for its sanction, and the sword for its sceptre, professed to
rest upon the peasantry, the large mass of producers not directly
involved in the struggle of capital and labor. It professed to save the
working class by breaking down parliamentarism, and, with it, the
undisguised subserviency of government to the propertied classes. It
professed to save the propertied classes by upholding their economic
supremacy over the working class; and, finally, it professed to unite
all classes by reviving for all the chimera of national glory.

In reality, it was the only form of government possible at a time when
the bourgeoisie had already lost, and the working class had not yet
acquired, the faculty of ruling the nation. It was acclaimed throughout
the world as the savior of society. Under its sway, bourgeois society,
freed from political cares, attained a development unexpected even by
itself. Its industry and commerce expanded to colossal dimensions;
financial swindling celebrated cosmopolitan orgies; the misery of the
masses was set off by a shameless display of gorgeous, meretricious and
debased luxury. The state power, apparently soaring high above society
and the very hotbed of all its corruptions. Its own rottenness, and the
rottenness of the society it had saved, were laid bare by the bayonet of
Prussia, herself eagerly bent upon transferring the supreme seat of that
regime from Paris to Berlin. Imperialism is, at the same time, the most
prostitute and the ultimate form of the state power which nascent middle
class society had commenced to elaborate as a means of its own
emancipation from feudalism, and which full-grown bourgeois society had
finally transformed into a means for the enslavement of labor by
capital.

The direct antithesis to the empire was the Commune. The cry of “social
republic,” with which the February Revolution was ushered in by the
Paris proletariat, did but express a vague aspiration after a republic
that was not only to supercede the monarchical form of class rule, but
class rule itself. The Commune was the positive form of that republic.

Paris, the central seat of the old governmental power, and, at the same
time, the social stronghold of the French working class, had risen in
arms against the attempt of Thiers and the Rurals to restore and
perpetuate that old governmental power bequeathed to them by the empire.
Paris could resist only because, in consequence of the siege, it had got
rid of the army, and replaced it by a National Guard, the bulk of which
consisted of working men. This fact was now to be transformed into an
institution. The first decree of the Commune, therefore, was the
suppression of the standing army, and the substitution for it of the
armed people.

The Commune was formed of the municipal councillors, chosen by universal
suffrage in the various wards of the town, responsible and revocable at
short terms. The majority of its members were naturally working men, or
acknowledged representatives of the working class. The Commune was to be
a working, not a parliamentary body, executive and legislative at the
same time.

Instead of continuing to be the agent of the Central Government, the
police was at once stripped of its political attributes, and turned into
the responsible, and at all times revocable, agent of the Commune. So
were the officials of all other branches of the administration. From the
members of the Commune downwards, the public service had to be done at
workman’s wage. The vested interests and the representation allowances
of the high dignitaries of state disappeared along with the high
dignitaries themselves. Public functions ceased to be the private
property of the tools of the Central Government. Not only municipal
administration, but the whole initiative hitherto exercised by the state
was laid into the hands of the Commune.

Having once got rid of the standing army and the police – the physical
force elements of the old government – the Commune was anxious to break
the spiritual force of repression, the “parson-power", by the
disestablishment and disendowment of all churches as proprietary bodies.
The priests were sent back to the recesses of private life, there to
feed upon the alms of the faithful in imitation of their predecessors,
the apostles.

The whole of the educational institutions were opened to the people
gratuitously, and at the same time cleared of all interference of church
and state. Thus, not only was education made accessible to all, but
science itself freed from the fetters which class prejudice and
governmental force had imposed upon it.

The judicial functionaries were to be divested of that sham independence
which had but served to mask their abject subserviency to all succeeding
governments to which, in turn, they had taken, and broken, the oaths of
allegiance. Like the rest of public servants, magistrates and judges
were to be elective, responsible, and revocable.

The Paris Commune was, of course, to serve as a model to all the great
industrial centres of France. The communal regime once established in
Paris and the secondary centres, the old centralized government would in
the provinces, too, have to give way to the self-government of the
producers.

In a rough sketch of national organization, which the Commune had no
time to develop, it states clearly that the Commune was to be the
political form of even the smallest country hamlet, and that in the
rural districts the standing army was to be replaced by a national
militia, with an extremely short term of service. The rural communities
of every district were to administer their common affairs by an assembly
of delegates in the central town, and these district assemblies were
again to send deputies to the National Delegation in Paris, each
delegate to be at any time revocable and bound by the mandat imperatif
(formal instructions) of his constituents. The few but important
functions which would still remain for a central government were not to
be suppressed, as has been intentionally misstated, but were to be
discharged by Communal and thereafter responsible agents.

The unity of the nation was not to be broken, but, on the contrary, to
be organized by Communal Constitution, and to become a reality by the
destruction of the state power which claimed to be the embodiment of
that unity independent of, and superior to, the nation itself, from
which it was but a parasitic excresence.

While the merely repressive organs of the old governmental power were to
be amputated, its legitimate functions were to be wrested from an
authority usurping pre-eminence over society itself, and restored to the
responsible agents of society. Instead of deciding once in three or six
years which member of the ruling class was to misrepresent the people in
Parliament, universal suffrage was to serve the people, constituted in
Communes, as individual suffrage serves every other employer in the
search for the workmen and managers in his business. And it is
well-known that companies, like individuals, in matters of real business
generally know how to put the right man in the right place, and, if they
for once make a mistake, to redress it promptly. On the other hand,
nothing could be more foreign to the spirit of the Commune than to
supercede universal suffrage by hierarchical investiture.^([A])

It is generally the fate of completely new historical creations to be
mistaken for the counterparts of older, and even defunct, forms of
social life, to which they may bear a certain likeness. Thus, this new
Commune, which breaks with the modern state power, has been mistaken for
a reproduction of the medieval Communes, which first preceded, and
afterward became the substratum of, that very state power. The Communal
Constitution has been mistaken for an attempt to break up into the
federation of small states, as dreamt of by Montesquieu and the
Girondins,^([B]) that unity of great nations which, if originally
brought about by political force, has now become a powerful coefficient
of social production. The antagonism of the Commune against the state
power has been mistaken for an exaggerated form of the ancient struggle
against over-centralization. Peculiar historical circumstances may have
prevented the classical development, as in France, of the bourgeois form
of government, and may have allowed, as in England, to complete the
great central state organs by corrupt vestries, jobbing councillors, and
ferocious poor-law guardians in the towns, and virtually hereditary
magistrates in the counties.

The Communal Constitution would have restored to the social body all the
forces hitherto absorbed by the state parasite feeding upon, and
clogging the free movement of, society. By this one act, it would have
initiated the regeneration of France.

The provincial French middle class saw in the Commune an attempt to
restore the sway their order had held over the country under Louis
Philippe, and which, under Louis Napoleon, was supplanted by the
pretended rule of the country over the towns. In reality, the Communal
Constitution brought the rural producers under the intellectual lead of
the central towns of their districts, and there secured to them, in the
working men, the natural trustees of their interests. The very existence
of the Commune involved, as a matter of course, local municipal liberty,
but no longer as a check upon the now superseded state power. It could
only enter into the head of a Bismarck – who, when not engaged on his
intrigues of blood and iron, always likes to resume his old trade, so
befitting his mental calibre, of contributor to Kladderadatsch (the
Berlin Punch)^([C]) – it could only enter into such a head to ascribe to
the Paris Commune aspirations after the caricature of the old French
municipal organization of 1791, the Prussian municipal constitution
which degrades the town governments to mere secondary wheels in the
police machinery of the Prussian state. The Commune made that catchword
of bourgeois revolutions – cheap government – a reality by destroying
the two greatest sources of expenditure: the standing army and state
functionarism. Its very existence presupposed the non-existence of
monarchy, which, in Europe at least, is the normal incumbrance and
indispensable cloak of class rule. It supplied the republic with the
basis of really democratic institutions. But neither cheap government
nor the “true republic” was its ultimate aim; they were its mere
concomitants.

The multiplicity of interpretations to which the Commune has been
subjected, and the multiplicity of interests which construed it in their
favor, show that it was a thoroughly expansive political form, while all
the previous forms of government had been emphatically repressive. Its
true secret was this:

It was essentially a working class government, the product of the
struggle of the producing against the appropriating class, the political
form at last discovered under which to work out the economical
emancipation of labor.

Except on this last condition, the Communal Constitution would have been
an impossibility and a delusion. The political rule of the producer
cannot co-exist with the perpetuation of his social slavery. The Commune
was therefore to serve as a lever for uprooting the economical
foundation upon which rests the existence of classes, and therefore of
class rule. With labor emancipated, every man becomes a working man, and
productive labor ceases to be a class attribute.

It is a strange fact. In spite of all the tall talk and all the immense
literature, for the last 60 years, about emancipation of labor, no
sooner do the working men anywhere take the subject into their own hands
with a will, than uprises at once all the apologetic phraseology of the
mouthpieces of present society with its two poles of capital and
wages-slavery (the landlord now is but the sleeping partner of the
capitalist), as if the capitalist society was still in its purest state
of virgin innocence, with its antagonisms still undeveloped, with its
delusions still unexploded, with its prostitute realities not yet laid
bare. The Commune, they exclaim, intends to abolish property, the basis
of all civilization!

Yes, gentlemen, the Commune intended to abolish that class property
which makes the labor of the many the wealth of the few. It aimed at the
expropriation of the expropriators. It wanted to make individual
property a truth by transforming the means of production, land, and
capital, now chiefly the means of enslaving and exploiting labor, into
mere instruments of free and associated labor. But this is communism,
“impossible” communism! Why, those members of the ruling classes who are
intelligent enough to perceive the impossibility of continuing the
present system – and they are many – have become the obtrusive and
full-mouthed apostles of co-operative production. If co-operative
production is not to remain a sham and a snare; if it is to supersede
the capitalist system; if united co-operative societies are to regulate
national production upon common plan, thus taking it under their own
control, and putting an end to the constant anarchy and periodical
convulsions which are the fatality of capitalist production – what else,
gentlemen, would it be but communism, “possible” communism?

The working class did not expect miracles from the Commune. They have no
ready-made utopias to introduce par décret du peuple. They know that in
order to work out their own emancipation, and along with it that higher
form to which present society is irresistably tending by its own
economical agencies, they will have to pass through long struggles,
through a series of historic processes, transforming circumstances and
men. They have no ideals to realize, but to set free the elements of the
new society with which old collapsing bourgeois society itself is
pregnant. In the full consciousness of their historic mission, and with
the heroic resolve to act up to it, the working class can afford to
smile at the coarse invective of the gentlemen’s gentlemen with pen and
inkhorn, and at the didactic patronage of well-wishing
bourgeois-doctrinaires, pouring forth their ignorant platitudes and
sectarian crotchets in the oracular tone of scientific infallibility.

When the Paris Commune took the management of the revolution in its own
hands; when plain working men for the first time dared to infringe upon
the governmental privilege of their “natural superiors,” and, under
circumstances of unexampled difficulty, performed it at salaries the
highest of which barely amounted to one-fifth of what, according to high
scientific authority,⁽¹⁾ is the minimum required for a secretary to a
certain metropolitan school-board – the old world writhed in convulsions
of rage at the sight of the Red Flag, the symbol of the Republic of
Labor, floating over the Hôtel de Ville.

And yet, this was the first revolution in which the working class was
openly acknowledged as the only class capable of social initiative, even
by the great bulk of the Paris middle class – shopkeepers, tradesmen,
merchants – the wealthy capitalist alone excepted. The Commune had saved
them by a sagacious settlement of that ever recurring cause of dispute
among the middle class themselves – the debtor and creditor
accounts.^([D]) The same portion of the middle class, after they had
assisted in putting down the working men’s insurrection of June 1848,
had been at once unceremoniously sacrificed to their creditors^([E]) by
the then Constituent Assembly. But this was not their only motive for
now rallying around the working class. They felt there was but one
alternative – the Commune, or the empire – under whatever name it might
reappear. The empire had ruined them economically by the havoc it made
of public wealth, by the wholesale financial swindling it fostered, by
the props it lent to the artificially accelerated centralization of
capital, and the concomitant expropriation of their own ranks. It had
suppressed them politically, it had shocked them morally by its orgies,
it had insulted their Voltairianism by handing over the education of
their children to the fréres Ignorantins,^([F]) it had revolted their
national feeling as Frenchmen by precipitating them headlong into a war
which left only one equivalent for the ruins it made – the disappearance
of the empire. In fact, after the exodus from Paris of the high
Bonapartist and capitalist bohème, the true middle class Party of Order
came out in the shape of the “Union Republicaine,”^([G]) enrolling
themselves under the colors of the Commune and defending it against the
wilful misconstructions of Thiers. Whether the gratitude of this great
body of the middle class will stand the present severe trial, time must
show.

The Commune was perfectly right in telling the peasants that “its
victory was their only hope.” Of all the lies hatched at Versailles and
re-echoed by the glorious European penny-a-liner, one of the most
tremendous was that the Rurals represented the French peasantry. Think
only of the love of the French peasant for the men to whom, after 1815,
he had to pay the milliard indemnity.^([H]) In the eyes of the French
peasant, the very existence of a great landed proprietor is in itself an
encroachment on his conquests of 1789. The bourgeois, in 1848, had
burdened his plot of land with the additional tax of 45 cents in the
franc; but then he did so in the name of the revolution; while now he
had fomented a civil war against revolution, to shift on to the
peasant’s shoulders the chief load of the 5 milliards of indemnity to be
paid to the Prussian. The Commune, on the other hand, in one of its
first proclamations, declared that the true originators of the war would
be made to pay its cost. The Commune would have delivered the peasant of
the blood tax – would have given him a cheap government – transformed
his present blood-suckers, the notary, advocate, executor, and other
judicial vampires, into salaried communal agents, elected by, and
responsible to, himself. It would have freed him of the tyranny of the
garde champêtre, the gendarme, and the prefect; would have put
enlightenment by the schoolmaster in the place of stultification by the
priest. And the French peasant is, above all, a man of reckoning. He
would find it extremely reasonable that the pay of the priest, instead
of being extorted by the tax-gatherer, should only depend upon the
spontaneous action of the parishioners’ religious instinct. Such were
the great immediate boons which the rule of the Commune – and that rule
alone – held out to the French peasantry. It is, therefore, quite
superfluous here to expatiate upon the more complicated but vital
problems which the Commune alone was able, and at the same time
compelled, to solve in favor of the peasant – viz., the hypothecary
debt, lying like an incubus upon his parcel of soil, the prolétariat
foncier (the rural proletariat), daily growing upon it, and his
expropriation from it enforced, at a more and more rapid rate, by the
very development of modern agriculture and the competition of capitalist
farming.

The French peasant had elected Louis Bonaparte president of the
Republic; but the Party of Order created the empire. What the French
peasant really wants he commenced to show in 1849 and 1850, by opposing
his maire to the government’s prefect, his school-master to the
government’s priest, and himself to the government’s gendarme. All the
laws made by the Party of Order in January and February 1850 were avowed
measures of repression against the peasant. The peasant was a
Bonapartist, because the Great Revolution, with all its benefits to him,
was, in his eyes, personified in Napoleon. This delusion, rapidly
breaking down under the Second Empire (and in its very nature hostile to
the Rurals), this prejudice of the past, how could it have withstood the
appeal of the Commune to the living interests and urgent wants of the
peasantry?

The Rurals – this was, in fact, their chief apprehension – knew that
three months’ free communication of Communal Paris with the provinces
would bring about a general rising of the peasants, and hence their
anxiety to establish a police blockade around Paris, so as to stop the
spread of the rinderpest [cattle pest – contagious disease].

If the Commune was thus the true representative of all the healthy
elements of French society, and therefore the truly national government,
it was, at the same time, as a working men’s government, as the bold
champion of the emancipation of labor, emphatically international.
Within sight of that Prussian army, that had annexed to Germany two
French provinces, the Commune annexed to France the working people all
over the world.

The Second Empire had been the jubilee of cosmopolitan blackleggism, the
rakes of all countries rushing in at its call for a share in its orgies
and in the plunder of the French people. Even at this moment, the right
hand of Thiers is Ganessco, the foul Wallachian, and his left hand is
Markovsky, the Russian spy. The Commune admitted all foreigners to the
honor of dying for an immortal cause. Between the foreign war lost by
their treason, and the civil war fomented by their conspiracy with the
foreign invader, the bourgeoisie had found the time to display their
patriotism by organizing police hunts upon the Germans in France. The
Commune made a German working man [Leo Frankel] its Minister of Labor.
Thiers, the bourgeoisie, the Second Empire, had continually deluded
Poland by loud professions of sympathy, while in reality betraying her
to, and doing the dirty work of, Russia. The Commune honored the heroic
sons of Poland [J. Dabrowski and W. Wróblewski] by placing them at the
head of the defenders of Paris. And, to broadly mark the new era of
history it was conscious of initiating, under the eyes of the conquering
Prussians on one side, and the Bonapartist army, led by Bonapartist
generals, on the other, the Commune pulled down that colossal symbol of
martial glory, the Vendôme Column.^([I])

The great social measure of the Commune was its own working existence.
Its special measures could but betoken the tendency of a government of
the people by the people. Such were the abolition of the nightwork of
journeymen bakers; the prohibition, under penalty, of the employers’
practice to reduce wages by levying upon their workpeople fines under
manifold pretexts – a process in which the employer combines in his own
person the parts of legislator, judge, and executor, and filches the
money to boot. Another measure of this class was the surrender to
associations of workmen, under reserve of compensation, of all closed
workshops and factories, no matter whether the respective capitalists
had absconded or preferred to strike work.

The financial measures of the Commune, remarkable for their sagacity and
moderation, could only be such as were compatible with the state of a
besieged town. Considering the colossal robberies committed upon the
city of Paris by the great financial companies and contractors, under
the protection of Haussman,^([J]) the Commune would have had an
incomparably better title to confiscate their property than Louis
Napoleon had against the Orleans family. The Hohenzollern and the
English oligarchs, who both have derived a good deal of their estates
from church plunders, were, of course, greatly shocked at the Commune
clearing but 8,000F out of secularization.

While the Versailles government, as soon as it had recovered some spirit
and strength, used the most violent means against the Commune; while it
put down the free expression of opinion all over France, even to the
forbidding of meetings of delegates from the large towns; while it
subjected Versailles and the rest of France to an espionage far
surpassing that of the Second Empire; while it burned by its gendarme
inquisitors all papers printed at Paris, and sifted all correspondence
from and to Paris; while in the National Assembly the most timid
attempts to put in a word for Paris were howled down in a manner unknown
even to the Chambre introuvable of 1816; with the savage warfare of
Versailles outside, and its attempts at corruption and conspiracy inside
Paris – would the Commune not have shamefully betrayed its trust by
affecting to keep all the decencies and appearances of liberalism as in
a time of profound peace? Had the government of the Commune been akin to
that of M. Thiers, there would have been no more occasion to suppress
Party of Order papers at Paris that there was to suppress Communal
papers at Versailles.

It was irritating indeed to the Rurals that at the very same time they
declared the return to the church to be the only means of salvation for
France, the infidel Commune unearthed the peculiar mysteries of the
Picpus nunnery, and of the Church of St. Laurent.^([K]) It was a satire
upon M. Thiers that, while he showered grand crosses upon the
Bonapartist generals in acknowledgment of their mastery in losing
battles, signing capitulations, and turning cigarettes at
Wilhelmshöhe,^([L]) the Commune dismissed and arrested its generals
whenever they were suspected of neglecting their duties. The expulsion
from, and arrest by, the Commune of one of its members [Blanchet] who
had slipped in under a false name, and had undergone at Lyons six days’
imprisonment for simple bankruptcy, was it not a deliberate insult
hurled at the forger, Jules Favre, then still the foreign minister of
France, still selling France to Bismarck, and still dictating his orders
to that paragon government of Belgium? But indeed the Commune did not
pretend to infallibility, the invariable attribute of all governments of
the old stamp. It published its doings and sayings, it initiated the
public into all its shortcomings.

In every revolution there intrude, at the side of its true agents, men
of different stamp; some of them survivors of and devotees to past
revolutions, without insight into the present movement, but preserving
popular influence by their known honesty and courage, or by the sheer
force of tradition; others mere brawlers who, by dint of repeating year
after year the same set of stereotyped declarations against the
government of the day, have sneaked into the reputation of
revolutionists of the first water. After March 18, some such men did
also turn up, and in some cases contrived to play pre-eminent parts. As
far as their power went, they hampered the real action of the working
class, exactly as men of that sort have hampered the full development of
every previous revolution. They are an unavoidable evil: with time they
are shaken off; but time was not allowed to the Commune.

Wonderful, indeed, was the change the Commune had wrought in Paris! No
longer any trace of the meretricious Paris of the Second Empire! No
longer was Paris the rendezvous of British landlords, Irish
absentees,^([M]) American ex-slaveholders and shoddy men, Russian
ex-serfowners, and Wallachian boyards. No more corpses at the morgue, no
nocturnal burglaries, scarcely any robberies; in fact, for the first
time since the days of February 1848, the streets of Paris were safe,
and that without any police of any kind.

“We,” said a member of the Commune, “hear no longer of assassination,
theft, and personal assault; it seems indeed as if the police had
dragged along with it to Versailles all its Conservative friends.”

The cocottes [‘chickens’ – prostitutes] had refound the scent of their
protectors – the absconding men of family, religion, and, above all, of
property. In their stead, the real women of Paris showed again at the
surface – heroic, noble, and devoted, like the women of antiquity.
Working, thinking fighting, bleeding Paris – almost forgetful, in its
incubation of a new society, of the Cannibals at its gates – radiant in
the enthusiasm of its historic initiative!

Opposed to this new world at Paris, behold the old world at Versailles –
that assembly of the ghouls of all defunct regimes, Legitimists and
Orleanists, eager to feed upon the carcass of the nation – with a tail
of antediluvian republicans, sanctioning, by their presence in the
Assembly, the slaveholders’ rebellion, relying for the maintenance of
their parliamentary republic upon the vanity of the senile mountebank at
its head, and caricaturing 1789 by holding their ghastly meetings in the
Jeu de Paume.⁽²⁾ There it was, this Assembly, the representative of
everything dead in France, propped up to the semblance of life by
nothing but the swords of the generals of Louis Bonaparte. Paris all
truth, Versailles all lie; and that lie vented through the mouth of
Thiers.

Thiers tells a deputation of the mayors of the Seine-et-Oise – “You may
rely upon my word, which I have never broken!”

He tells the Assembly itself that “it was the most freely elected and
most liberal Assembly France ever possessed"; he tells his motley
soldiery that it was “the admiration of the world, and the finest army
France ever possessed”; he tells the provinces that the bombardment of
Paris by him was a myth: “If some cannon-shots have been fired, it was
not the deed of the army of Versailles, but of some insurgents trying to
make believe that they are fighting, while they dare not show their
faces.” He again tells the provinces that “the artillery of Versailles
does not bombard Paris, but only cannonades it". He tells the Archbishop
of Paris that the pretended executions and reprisals (!) attributed to
the Versailles troops were all moonshine. He tells Paris that he was
only anxious “to free it from the hideous tyrants who oppress it,” and
that, in fact, the Paris of the Commune was “but a handful of
criminals.”

The Paris of M. Thiers was not the real Paris of the “vile multitude,”
but a phantom Paris, the Paris of the francs-fileurs,^([N]) the Paris of
the Boulevards, male and female – the rich, the capitalist, the gilded,
the idle Paris, now thronging with its lackeys, its blacklegs, its
literary bonhome, and its cocottes at Versailles, Saint-Denis, Rueil,
and Saint-Germain; considering the civil war but an agreeable diversion,
eyeing the battle going on through telescopes, counting the rounds of
cannon, swearing by their own honor and that of their prostitutes, that
the performance was far better got up than it used to be at the Porte
St. Martin. The men who fell were really dead; the cries of the wounded
were cries in good earnest; and, besides, the whole thing was so
intensely historical.

This is the Paris of M. Thiers, as the emigration of Coblenz was the
France of M. de Calonne.^([O])

Authors Notes

⁽¹⁾ Professor Huxley. [Note to the German addition of 1871.]

⁽²⁾ The tennis court where the National Assembly of 1789 adopted its
famous decisions. [Note to the German addition of 1871.]

Editorial Notes

^([A]) A top-down system of appointing officials in bourgeois systems,
where high-up officials appoint many or all lower officials.

^([B]) The party of the influential bourgeoisie during the French
revolution at the end of the 18th century. (The name is derived from the
Department of Gironde.) It came out against the Jacobin government and
the revolutionary masses which supported it, under the banner of
defending the departments’ right to autonomy and federation.

^([C]) Satirical/humorous liberal weekly papers.

^([D]) A reference to the Paris Commune’s decree of April 16, 1871,
providing for payment of all debts in installments over three years and
abolition of interest on them.

^([E]) On Aug. 22, 1848, the Constituent Assembly rejected the bill on
“amiable agreements” (“concordats á l’ amiable ”) aimed to introduce the
deferred payment of debts. As a result of this measure, a considerable
section of the petty-bourgeoisie were utterly ruined and found
themselves completely dependent on the creditors of the richest
bourgeoisie.

^([F]) (Ignorant Brothers) – a nickname for a religious order, founded
in Rheims in 1680, whose members pledged themselves to educate children
of the poor. The pupils received a predominantly religious education and
barely any knowledge otherwise.

^([G]) This refers to the Alliance républicaine des Départements – a
political association of petty-bourgeois representatives from the
various departments of France, who lived in Paris; calling on the people
to fight against the Versailles government and the monarchist National
Assembly and to support the Commune throughout the country.

^([H]) The law of April 27, 1825 on the payment of compensation to the
former emigres for the landed states confiscated from them during the
preceding French Revolution.

^([I]) The Vendôme Column was erected between 1806 and 1810 in Paris in
honor of the victories of Napoleonic France; it was made out of the
bronze captured from enemy guns and was crowned by a statue of Napoleon.
On May 16, 1871, by order of the Paris Commune, the Vendôme Column was
pulled down.

^([J]) During the Second Empire, Baron Haussmann was Prefect of the
Department of the Seine (the City of Paris). He introduced a number of
changes in the layout of the city for the purpose of crushing workers’
revolts.

^([K]) In the Picpus nunnery cases of the nuns being incarcerated in
cells for many years were exposed and instruments of torture were found;
in the church of St. Laurent a secret cemetery was found attesting to
the murders that had been committed there. These facts were finally
exposed by the Commune’s newspaper Mot d’Ordre on May 5, 1871, and also
in the pamphlet Les Crimes des congreégations religieuses.

^([L]) The chief occupation of the French prisoners of war in
Wilhelmshöhe (those captured after the Battle of Sedan) was making
cigars for their own use.

^([M]) Rich landowners who hardly ever visited their estates, but
instead had their land managed by agents or leased it to petty-bourgeois
who, in their turn, sub-leased the land at high rents.

^([N]) (litterly rendered: “free absconder”) – the nickname given to the
Paris bourgeois who fled from the city during the siege. The name
carried brazen historical irony as a result of its resemblance to the
word “francs-tireurs ” (“free sharpshooters”) – French guerrillas who
actively fought against the Prussians.

^([O]) A city in Germany; during the French Revolution at the end of the
18th-century it was the center where the landlord monarchist emigres
made preparations for intervention against revolutionary France. Coblenz
was the seat of the emigre government headed by the rabid reactionary de
Calonne, a former minister of Louis XVI.

Chapter 6
The Third Address
 May, 1871

[The Fall of Paris]

The first attempt of the slaveholders’ conspiracy to put down Paris by
getting the Prussians to occupy it was frustrated by Bismarck’s refusal.

The second attempt, that of March 18, ended in the rout of the army and
the flight to Versailles of the government, which ordered the whole
administration to break up and follow in its track.

By the semblance of peace negotiations with Paris, Thiers found the time
to prepare for war against it. But where to find an army? The remnants
of the line regiments were weak in number and unsafe in character. His
urgent appeal to the provinces to succour Versailles, by their National
Guards and volunteers, met with a flat refusal. Brittany alone furnished
a handful of Chouans[A] fighting under a white flag, every one of them
wearing on his breast the heart of Jesus in white cloth, and shouting
“Vive le Roi!” (Long live the King!)

Thiers was, therefore, compelled to collect, in hot haste, a motley
crew, composed of sailors, marines, Pontifical Zouaves, Valentin’s
gendarmes, and Pietri’s sergents-de-ville and mouchards. This army,
however, would have been ridiculously ineffective without the
instalments of imperialist war prisoners, which Bismarck granted in
numbers just sufficient to keep the civil war a-going, and keep the
Versailles government in abject dependence on Prussia. During the war
itself, the Versailles police had to look after the Versailles army,
while the gendarmes had to drag it on by exposing themselves at all
posts of danger. The forts which fell were not taken, but bought. The
heroism of the Federals convinced Thiers that the resistance of Paris
was not to be broken by his own strategic genius and the bayonets at his
disposal.

Meanwhile, his relations with the provinces became more and more
difficult. Not one single address of approval came in to gladden Thiers
and his Rurals. Quite the contrary. Deputations and addresses demanding,
in a tone anything but respectful, conciliation with Paris on the basis
of the unequivocal recognition of the republic, the acknowledgment of
the Communal liberties, and the dissolution of the National Assembly,
whose mandate was extinct, poured in from all sides, and in such numbers
that Dufaure, Thiers’ Minister of Justice, in his circular of April 23
to the public prosecutors, commanded them to treat “the cry of
conciliation” as a crime! In regard, however, of the hopeless prospect
held out by his campaign, Thiers resolved to shift his tactics by
ordering, all over the country, municipal elections to take place on
April 30, on the basis of the new municipal law dictated by himself to
the National Assembly. What with the intrigues of his prefects, what
with police intimidation, he felt quite sanguine of imparting, by the
verdict of the provinces, to the National Assembly that moral power it
had never possessed, and of getting at last from the provinces the
physical force required for the conquest of Paris.

His bandit-warfare against Paris, exalted in his own bulletins, and the
attempts of his ministers at the establishment, throughout France, of a
reign of terror, Thiers was from the beginning anxious to accompany with
a little by-play of conciliation, which had to serve more than one
purpose. It was to dupe the provinces, to inveigle the middle class
elements in Paris, and above all, to afford the professed republicans in
the National Assembly the opportunity of hiding their treason against
Paris behind their faith in Thiers.

On March 21, when still without an army, he had declared to the
Assembly: “Come what may, I will not send an army to Paris.”

On March 27, he rose again: “I have found the republic an accomplished
fact, and I am firmly resolved to maintain it.”

In reality, he put down the revolution at Lyons and Marseilles^([B]) in
the name of the republic, while the roars of his Rurals drowned the very
mention of his name at Versailles. After this exploit, he toned down the
“accomplished fact” into a hypothetical fact. The Orleans princes, whom
he had cautiously warned off Bordeaux, were now, in flagrant breach of
the law, permitted to intrigue at Dreux. The concessions held out by
Thiers in his interminable interviews with the delegates from Paris and
the provinces, although constantly varied in tone and color, according
to time and circumstances, did in fact never come to more than the
prospective restriction of revenge to the “handful of criminals
implicated in the murder of Lecomte and Clement Thomas,” on the
well-understood premise that Paris and France were unreservedly to
accept M. Thiers himself as the best of possible Republics, as he, in
1830, had done with Louis Philippe, and in 1849 under Louis Bonaparte’s
presidency. While out of office, he made a fortune by pleading for the
Paris capitalists, and made political capital by pleading against the
laws he had himself originated. He now hurried through the National
Assembly not only a set of repressive laws which were, after the fall of
Paris, to extirpate the last remnants of republican liberty in France;
he foreshadowed the fate of Paris by abridging what was for him the too
slow procedure of courts-martial,^([C]) and by a new-fangled, Draconic
code of deportation. The Revolution of 1848, abolishing the penalty of
death for political crimes, had replaced it by deportation. Louis
Bonaparte did not dare, at least not in theory, to re-establish the
regime of the guillotine. The Rural Assembly, not yet bold enough even
to hint that the Parisians were not rebels, but assassins, had therefore
to confine its prospective vengeance against Paris to Dufaure’s new code
of deportation. Under all these circumstances, Thiers himself could not
have gone on with his comedy of conciliation, had it not, as he intended
it to do, drawn forth shrieks of rage from the Rurals, whose ruminating
mind did neither understand the play, nor its necessities of hypocrisy,
tergiversation, and procrastination.

In sight of the impending municipal elections of April 30, Thiers
enacted one of his great conciliation scenes on April 27. Amidst a flood
of sentiment rhetoric, he exclaimed from the tribune of the Assembly:

“There exists no conspiracy against the republic but that of Paris,
which compels us to shed French blood. I repeat it again and again. Let
those impious arms fall from the hands which hold them, and chastisement
will be arrested at once by an act of peace excluding only the small
number of criminals.”

To the violent interruption of the Rurals, he replied:

“Gentlemen, tell me, I implore you, am I wrong? Do you really regret
that I could have stated the truth that the criminals are only a
handful? Is it not fortunate in the midst of our misfortunes that those
who have been capable to shed the blood of Clement Thomas and General
Lecomte are but rare exceptions?”

France, however, turned a deaf ear to what Thiers flattered himself to
be a parliamentary siren’s song. Out of 700,000 municipal councillors
returned by the 35,000 communes still left to France, the united
Legitimists, Orleanists, and Bonapartists did not carry 8,000.

The supplementary elections which followed were still more decidedly
hostile.

Thus, instead of getting from the provinces the badly-needed physical
force, the National Assembly lost even its last claim to moral force,
that of being the expression of the universal suffrage of the country.
To complete the discomfiture, the newly-chosen municipal councils of all
the cities of France openly threatened the usurping Assembly at
Versailles with a counter assembly at Bordeaux.

Then the long-expected moment of decisive action had at last come for
Bismarck. He peremptorily summoned Thiers to send to Frankfort
plenipotentiaries for the definitive settlement of peace. In humble
obedience to the call of his master, Thiers hastened to despatch his
trusty Jules Favre, backed by Pouyer-Quertier. Pouyer-Quertier, an
“eminent” Rouen cotton-spinner, a fervent and even servile partisan of
the Second Empire, had never found any fault with it save its commercial
treaty with England,^([D]) prejudicial to his own shop-interest. Hardly
installed at Bordeaux as Thiers’ Minister of Finance, he denounced that
“unholy” treaty, hinted at its near abrogation, and had even the
effrontery to try, although in vain (having counted without Bismarck),
the immediate enforcement of the old protective duties against Alsace,
where, he said, no previous international treaties stood in the way.
This man who considered counter-revolution as a means to put down wages
at Rouen, and the surrender of French provinces as a means to bring up
the price of his wares in France, was he not the one predestined to be
picked out by Thiers as the helpmate of Jules Favre in his last and
crowning treason?

On the arrival at Frankfurt of this exquisite pair of plenipotentiaries,
bully Bismarck at once met them with the imperious alternative: Either
the restoration of the empire or the unconditional acceptance of my own
peace terms! These terms included a shortening of the intervals in which
war indemnity was to be paid and the continued occupation of the Paris
forts by Prussian troops until Bismarck should feel satisfied with the
state of things in France; Prussia thus being recognized as the supreme
arbiter in internal French politics! In return for this, he offered to
let loose for the extermination of Paris the Bonapartist army, and to
lend them the direct assistance of Emperor William’s troops. He pledged
his good faith by making payment of the first installment of the
indemnity dependent on the “pacification” of Paris. Such bait was, of
course, eagerly swallowed by Thiers and his plenipotentiaries. They
signed the treaty of peace on May 10 and had it endorsed by the
Versailles Assembly on the 18th.

In the interval between the conclusion of peace and the arrival of the
Bonapartist prisoners, Thiers felt the more bound to resume his comedy
of conciliation, as his republican tools stood in sore need of a pretext
for blinking their eyes at the preparations for the carnage of Paris. As
late as May 18, he replied to a deputation of middle-class conciliators
–

“Whenever the insurgents will make up their minds for capitulation, the
gates of Paris shall be flung wide open during a week for all except the
murderers of Generals Clement Thomas and Lecomte.”

A few days afterwards, when violently interpellated on these promises by
the Rurals, he refused to enter into any explanations; not, however,
without giving them this significant hint:

“I tell you there are impatient men amongst you, men who are in too
great a hurry. They must have another eight days; at the end of these
eight days there will be no more danger, and the task will be
proportionate to their courage and to their capacities.”

As soon as MacMahon was able to assure him, that he could shortly enter
Paris, Thiers declared to the Assembly that

“he would enter Paris with the laws in his hands, and demand a full
expiation from the wretches who had sacrificed the lives of soldiers and
destroyed public monuments.”

As the moment of decision drew near, he said – to the Assembly, “I shall
be pitiless!” – to Paris, that it was doomed; and to his Bonapartist
bandits, that they had state licence to wreak vengeance upon Paris to
their hearts’ content.

At last, when treachery had opened the gates of Paris to General Douai,
on May 21, Thiers, on the 22nd, revealed to the Rurals the “goal” of his
conciliation comedy, which they had so obstinately persisted in not
understanding.

“I told you a few days ago that we were approaching our goal; today I
come to tell you the goal is reached. The victory of order, justice, and
civilization is at last won!”

So it was. The civilization and justice of bourgeois order comes out in
its lurid light whenever the slaves and drudges of that order rise
against their masters. Then this civilization and justice stand forth as
undisguised savagery and lawless revenge. Each new crisis in the class
struggle between the appropriator and the producer brings out this fact
more glaringly. Even the atrocities of the bourgeois in June 1848 vanish
before the infamy of 1871. The self-sacrificing heroism with which the
population of Paris – men, women, and children – fought for eight days
after the entrance of the Versaillese, reflects as much the grandeur of
their cause, as the infernal deeds of the soldiery reflect the innate
spirit of that civilization, indeed, the great problem of which is how
to get rid of the heaps of corpses it made after the battle was over!

To find a parallel for the conduct of Thiers and his bloodhounds we must
go back to the times of Sulla and the two Triumvirates of Rome.^([E])
The same wholesale slaughter in cold blood; the same disregard, in
massacre, of age and sex, the same system of torturing prisoners; the
same proscriptions, but this time of a whole class; the same savage hunt
after concealed leaders, lest one might escape; the same denunciations
of political and private enemies; the same indifference for the butchery
of entire strangers to the feud.

There is but this difference: that the Romans had no mitrailleuses for
the despatch, in the lump, of the proscribed, and that they had not “the
law in their hands,” nor on their lips the cry of “civilization.”

And after those horrors look upon the other still more hideous face of
the bourgeois civilization as described by its own press!

“With stray shots,” writes the Paris correspondent of a London Tory
paper, “still ringing in the distance, and unintended wounded wretches
dying amid the tombstones of Pere la Chaise – with 6,000 terror-stricken
insurgents wandering in an agony of despair in the labyrinth of the
catacombs, and wretches hurried through the streets to be shot down in
scores by the mitrailleuse – it is revolting to see the cafes filled
with the votaries of absinthe, billiards, and dominoes; female
profligacy perambulating the boulevards, and the sound of revelry
disturbing the night from the cabinets particuliers of fashionable
restaurants.”

M. Edouard Herve writes in the Journal de Paris, a Versaillist journal
pressed by the Commune:

“The way in which the population of Paris [!] manifested its
satisfaction yesterday was rather more than frivolous, and we fear it
will grow worse as time progresses. Paris has now a fete day appearance,
which is sadly out of place; and, unless we are to be called the
Parisiens de la decadence, this sort of thing must come to an end.”

And then he quotes the passage from Tacitus:

“Yet, on the morrow of that horrible struggle, even before it was
completely over, Rome – degraded and corrupt – began once more to wallow
in the voluptuous slough which was destroying its body and pulling its
soul – alibi proelia et vulnera, alibi balnea popinoeque [here fights
and wounds, there baths and restaurants].”

M. Herve only forgets to say that the “population of Paris” he speaks of
is but the population of the Paris of M. Thiers – the francs-fileurs
returning in throngs from Versailles, Saint-Denis, Rueil, and Saint
Germain – the Paris of the “Decline.”

In all its bloody triumphs over the self-sacrificing champions of a new
and better society, that nefarious civilization, based upon the
enslavement of labor, drowns the moans of its victims in a hue-and-cry
of calumny, reverberated by a world-wide echo. The serene working men’s
Paris of the Commune is suddenly changed into a pandemonium by the
bloodhounds of “order.”

And what does this tremendous change prove to the bourgeois mind of all
countries? Why, that the Commune has conspired against civilization! The
Paris people die enthusiastically for the Commune in numbers unequally
in any battle known to history. What does that prove? Why, that the
Commune was not the people’s own government but the usurpation of a
handful of criminals! The women of Paris joyfully give up their lives at
the barricades and on the place of execution. What does this prove? Why,
that the demon of the Commune has changed them into Megaera and Hecates!

The moderation of the Commune during the two months of undisputed sway
is equalled only by the heroism of its defence.

What does that prove? Why, that for months the Commune carefully hid,
under a mask of moderation and humanity, the bloodthirstiness of its
fiendish instincts to be let loose in the hour of its agony!

The working men’s Paris, in the act of its heroic self-holocaust,
involved in its flames buildings and monuments. While tearing to pieces
the living body of the proletariat, its rulers must no longer expect to
return triumphantly into the intact architecture of their abodes. The
government of Versailles cries, “Incendiarism!” and whispers this cue to
all its agents, down to the remotest hamlet, to hunt up its enemies
everywhere as suspect of professional incendiarism. The bourgeoisie of
the whole world, which looks complacently upon the wholesale massacre
after the battle, is convulsed by horror at the desecration of brick and
mortar!

When governments give state licences to their navies to “kill, burn, and
destroy,” is that licence for incendiarism? When the British troops
wantonly set fire to the Capitol at Washington and to the summer palace
of the Chinese emperor,^([F]) was that incendiarism? When the Prussians
not for military reasons, but out of the mere spite of revenge, burned
down, by the help of petroleum, towns like Chateaudun and innumerable
villages, was that incendiarism? When Thiers, during six weeks,
bombarded Paris, under the pretext that he wanted to set fire to those
houses only in which there were people, was that incendiarism? – In war,
fire is an arm as legitimate as any. Buildings held by the enemy are
shelled to set them on fire. If their defenders have to retire, they
themselves light the flames to prevent the attack from making use of the
buildings. To be burned down has always been the inevitable fate of all
buildings situated in the front of battle of all the regular armies of
the world.

But in the war of the enslaved against their enslavers, the only
justifiable war in history, this is by no means to hold good! The
Commune used fire strictly as a means of defence. They used it to stop
up to the Versailles troops those long, straight avenues which Haussman
had expressly opened to artillery-fire; they used it to cover their
retreat, in the same way as the Versaillese, in their advance, used
their shells which destroyed at least as many buildings as the fire of
the Commune. It is a matter of dispute, even now, which buildings were
set fire to by the defence, and which by the attack. And the defence
resorted to fire only then when the Versailles troops had already
commenced their wholesale murdering of prisoners.

Besides, the Commune had, long before, given full public notice that if
driven to extremities, they would bury themselves under the ruins of
Paris, and make Paris a second Moscow, as the Government of National
Defence, but only as a cloak for its treason, had promised to do. For
this purpose Trochu had found them the petroleum. The Commune knew that
its opponents cared nothing for the lives of the Paris people, but cared
much for their own Paris buildings. And Thiers, on the other hand, had
given them notice that he would be implacable in his vengeance. No
sooner had he got his army ready on one side, and the Prussians shutting
the trap on the other, than he proclaimed: “I shall be pitiless! The
expiation will be complete, and justice will be stern!” If the acts of
the Paris working men were vandalism, it was the vandalism of defence in
despair, not the vandalism of triumph, like that which the Christians
perpetrated upon the really priceless art treasures of heathen
antiquity; and even that vandalism has been justified by the historian
as an unavoidable and comparatively trifling concomitant to the titanic
struggle between a new society arising and an old one breaking down. It
was still less the vandalism of Haussman, razing historic Paris to make
place for the Paris of the sightseer!

But the execution by the Commune of the 64 hostages, with the Archbishop
of Paris at their head! The bourgeoisie and its army, in June 1848,
re-established a custom which had long disappeared from the practice of
war – the shooting of their defenceless prisoners. This brutal custom
has since been more or less strictly adhered to by the suppressors of
all popular commotions in Europe and India; thus proving that it
constitutes a real “progress of civilization”!

On the other hand, the Prussians in France, had re-established the
practice of taking hostages – innocent men, who, with their lives, were
to answer to them for the acts of others. When Thiers, as we have seen,
from the very beginning of the conflict, enforced the human practice of
shooting down the Communal prisoners, the Commune, to protect their
lives, was obliged to resort to the Prussian practice of securing
hostages. The lives of the hostages have been forfeited over and over
again by the continued shooting of prisoners on the part of the
Versaillese. How could they be spared any longer after the carnage with
which MacMahon’s praetorians^([G]) celebrated their entrance into Paris?

Was even the last check upon the unscrupulous ferocity of bourgeois
governments – the taking of hostages – to be made a mere sham of?

The real murderer of Archbishop Darboy is Thiers. The Commune again and
again had offered to exchange the archbishop, and ever so many priests
in the bargain, against the single Blanqui, then in the hands of Thiers.
Thiers obstinately refused. He knew that with Blanqui he would give the
Commune a head; while the archbishop would serve his purpose best in the
shape of a corpse.

Thiers acted upon the precedent of Cavaignac. How, in June 1848, did not
Cavaignac and his men of order raise shouts of horror by stigmatizing
the insurgents as the assassins of Archbishop Affre! They knew perfectly
well that the archbishop had been shot by the soldiers of order. M.
Jacquemet, the archbishop’s vicar-general, present on the spot, had
immediately afterwards handed them in his evidence to that effect.

All the chorus of calumny, which the Party of Order never fail, in their
orgies of blood, to raise against their victims, only proves that the
bourgeois of our days considers himself the legitimate successor to the
baron of old, who thought every weapon in his own hand fair against the
plebeian, while in the hands of the plebeian a weapon of any kind
constituted in itself a crime.

The conspiracy of the ruling class to break down the revolution by a
civil war carried on under the patronage of the foreign invader – a
conspiracy which we have traced from the very 4th of September down to
the entrance of MacMahon’s praetorians through the gate of St. Cloud –
culminated in the carnage of Paris. Bismarck gloats over the ruins of
Paris, in which he saw perhaps the first installment of that general
destruction of great cities he had prayed for when still a simple Rural
in the Prussian Chambre introuvable of 1849.^([H]) He gloats over the
cadavers of the Paris proletariat. For him, this is not only the
extermination of revolution, but the extinction of France, now
decapitated in reality, and by the French government itself. With the
shallowness characteristic of all successful statesmen, he sees but the
surface of this tremendous historic event. Whenever before has history
exhibited the spectacle of a conqueror crowning his victory by turning
into, not only the gendarme, but the hired bravo of the conquered
government? There existed no war between Prussia and the Commune of
Paris. On the contrary, the Commune had accepted the peace
preliminaries, and Prussia had announced her neutrality. Prussia was,
therefore, no belligerent. She acted the part of a bravo, a cowardly
bravo, because incurring no danger; a hired bravo, because stipulating
beforehand the payment of her blood-money of 500 millions on the fall of
Paris. And thus, at last, came out the true character of the war,
ordained by Providence, as a chastisement of godless and debauched
France by pious and moral Germany! And this unparalleled breach of the
law of nations, even as understood by the old-world lawyers, instead of
arousing the “civilized” governments of Europe to declare the felonious
Prussian government, the mere tool of the St. Petersburg Cabinet, an
outlaw amongst nations, only incites them to consider whether the few
victims who escape the double cordon around Paris are not to be given up
to the hangman of Versailles!

That, after the most tremendous war of modern times, the conquering and
the conquered hosts should fraternize for the common massacre of the
proletariat – this unparalleled event does indicate, not, as Bismarck
thinks, the final repression of a new society up heaving, but the
crumbling into dust of bourgeois society. The highest heroic effort of
which old society is still capable is national war; and this is now
proved to be a mere governmental humbug, intended to defer the struggle
of classes, and to be thrown aside as soon as that class struggle bursts
out into civil war. Class rule is no longer able to disguise itself in a
national uniform; the national governments are one as against the
proletariat!

After Whit-Sunday, 1871, there can be neither peace nor truce possible
between the working men of France and the appropriators of their
produce. The iron hand of a mercenary soldiery may keep for a time both
classes tied down in common oppression. But the battle must break out
again and again in ever-growing dimensions, and there can be no doubt as
to who will be the victor in the end – the appropriating few, or the
immense working majority. And the French working class is only the
advanced guard of the modern proletariat.

While the European governments thus testify, before Paris, to the
international character of class rule, they cry down the International
Working Men’s Association – the international counter-organization of
labor against the cosmopolitan conspiracy of capital – as the head
fountain of all these disasters. Thiers denounced it as the despot of
labor, pretending to be its liberator. Picard ordered that all
communications between the French Internationals and those abroad be cut
off; Count Jaubert, Thiers’ mummified accomplice of 1835, declares it
the great problem of all civilized governments to weed it out. The
Rurals roar against it, and the whole European press joins the chorus.
An honorable French writer [Robinet], completely foreign to our
Association, speaks as follows:

“The members of the Central Committee of the National Guard, as well as
the greater part of the members of the Commune, are the most active,
intelligent, and energetic minds of the International Working Men’s
Association... men who are thoroughly honest, sincere, intelligent,
devoted, pure, and fanatical in the good sense of the word.”

The police-tinged bourgeois mind naturally figures to itself the
International Working Men’s Association as acting in the manner of a
secret conspiracy, its central body ordering, from time to time,
explosions in different countries. Our Association is, in fact, nothing
but the international bond between the most advanced working men in the
various countries of the civilized world. Wherever, in whatever shape,
and under whatever conditions the class struggle obtains any
consistency, it is but natural that members of our Association, should
stand in the foreground. The soil out of which it grows is modern
society itself. It cannot be stamped out by any amount of carnage. To
stamp it out, the governments would have to stamp out the despotism of
capital over labor – the condition of their own parasitical existence.

Working men’s Paris, with its Commune, will be forever celebrated as the
glorious harbinger of a new society. Its martyrs are enshrined in the
great heart of the working class. Its exterminators history has already
nailed to that eternal pillory from which all the prayers of their
priest will not avail to redeem them.

The General Council

M. J. Boon, Fred. Bradnick, G. H. Buttery, Caihil, Delayhaye, William
Hales, A. Hermann, Kolb, Fred. Lessner, Lochner, T. P. Macdonnell,
George Milner, Thomas Mottershead, Ch. Mills, Charles Murray, Pfander,
Roach, Rochat, Ruhl, Sadler, A. Ser- Railler, Cowell Stepney, Alf.
Taylor, William Townshend.

Corresponding Secretaries:

Eugene Dupont, For France Zevy Maurice, For Hungary Karl Marx, For
Germany And Anton Zabicki, For Poland Holland James Cohen, For Denmark
Fred. Engels, For Belgium And J.G. Eccarius, For The United Spain States
Hermann Jung, For Switzerland P. Giovacchini, For Italy

Hermann Jung, Chairman John Weston, Treasurer George Harris, Financial
Secretary J. George Eccarius, General Secretary

Office: 256 High Holborn Road, London, W.C., May 30, 1871

Footnotes

^([A]) This name was given to the Versailles soldiers of royalist
sympathies recruited in Brittany, by analogy with those who took part in
the counter-revolutionary royalist insurrection in North-Western France
during the French Revolution at the end of the 18th century.

^([B]) Under the impact of the proletarian revolution in Paris which led
to the establishment of the Commune, revolutionary mass actions of a
similar nature took place in Lyons and Marseilles. However, these were
brutally crushed by French government troops.

^([C]) Under the law concerning the procedure of military courts,
submitted by Dufaure to the National Assembly, it was ruled that cases
were to be investigated and sentences carried out within 48 hours.

^([D]) This trade treaty between England and France was concluded on
January 23, 1860. Under its terms France was to abandon her prohibitive
Customs policy and replace it by introducing new import duties. As
result of the influx of English goods to France, competition in the home
market dramatically increased, causing dissatisfaction among some French
manufacturers.

^([E]) This refers to the reign of terror and bloody repression in
Ancient Rome at the various stages of the crisis of the slave-owning
Roman Republic in the first century B.C.E. – Sulla’s dictatorship (in
82-79 B.C.E.), and the first and second triumvirates: Pompey, Caesar,
Crassus (60-53) and Octavian, Antonius, Lepidus (43-36 B.C.E.)
respectively.

^([F]) In August 1814, during the war between Britain and the United
States, British troops seized Washington and burned the Capitol, the
White House and other public buildings to the ground. In October 1860,
during the war waged by Britain and France against China (the first of
the Opium Wars), British and French troops pillaged and burned down the
summer palace of the Chinese emperors near Beijing, a treasure-house of
Chinese art and architecture.

^([G]) In ancient Rome the privileged life-guards of the general or
emperor; they constantly took part in internal disturbances. Later the
word “praetorians” became the symbol of the mercenary, tyrannical nature
of the militarists.

^([H]) This is what Marx called the Prussian Assembly by analogy with
the French Chambre introuvable. The Assembly elected in January and
February 1849 consisted of two chambers: the first was a privileged
aristocratic “chamber of the gentry"; the composition of the second was
determined by two-stage elections in which only the so-called
“independent” Prussians took part. Elected to the second chamber,
Bismarck became one of the leaders of the extremely reactionary Junker
group.

1891 Postscript by Friedrich Engels

[A]

I did not anticipate that I would be asked to prepare a new edition of
the Address of the General Council of the International on The Civil War
in France, and to write an introduction to it. Therefore I can only
touch briefly here on the most important points.

I am prefacing the longer work mentioned above by the two shorter
addresses of the General Council on the Franco-Prussian War. In the
first place, because the second of these, which itself cannot be fully
understood without the first, is referred to in The Civil War. But also
because these two Addresses, likewise drafted by Marx, are, no less than
The Civil War, outstanding examples of the author’s remarkable gift,
first proved in The Eighteenth Brumaire of Louis Bonaparte, for grasping
clearly the character, the import, and the necessary consequences of
great historical events, at a time when these events are still in
process before our eyes, or have only just taken place. And, finally,
because we in Germany are still having to endure the consequences which
Marx prophesied would follow from these events.

Has that which was declared in the first Address not come to pass: that
if Germany’s defensive war against Louis Bonaparte degenerated into a
war of conquest against the French people, all the misfortunes which
befell Germany after the so-called wars of liberation^([B]) would revive
again with renewed intensity? Have we not had a further 20 years of
Bismarck’s government, the Exceptional Law and the anti-socialist
campaign taking the place of the prosecutions of demagogues,^([C]) with
the same arbitrary police measures and with literally the same
staggering interpretations of the law?

And has not the prophecy been proved to the letter that the annexation
of Alsace-Lorraine would "force France into the arms of Russia," and
that after this annexation Germany must either become the avowed tool of
Russia, or must, after some short respite, arm for a new war, and,
moreover, "a race war against the combined Slavonic and Roman races"?
Has not the annexation of the French provinces driven France into the
arms of Russia? Has not Bismarck for fully 20 years vainly wooed the
favor of the tsar, wooed it with services even more lowly than those
which little Prussia, before it became the "first power in Europe," was
wont to lay at Holy Russia’s feet? And is there not every day hanging
over our heads the Damocles’ sword of war, on the first day of which all
the chartered covenants of princes will be scattered like chaff; a war
of which nothing is certain but the absolute uncertainty of its outcome;
a race war which will subject the whole of Europe to devastation by 15
or 20 million armed men, and is only not already raging because even the
strongest of the great military states shrinks before the absolute
incalculability of its final outcome?

All the more is it our duty to make again accessible to the German
workers these brilliant proofs, now half-forgotten, of the
far-sightedness of the international working class policy in 1870.

What is true of these two Addresses is also true of The Civil War in
France. On May 28, the last fighters of the Commune succumbed to
superior forces on the slopes of Belleville; and only two days later, on
May 30, Marx read to the General Council the work in which the
historical significance of the Paris Commune is delineated in short
powerful strokes, but with such clearness, and above all such truth, as
has never again been attained on all the mass of literature which has
been written on this subject.

If today, we look back at the activity and historical significance of
the Paris Commune of 1871, we shall find it necessary to make a few
additions to the account given in The Civil War in France.

The members of the Commune were divided into a majority of the
Blanquists, who had also been predominant in the Central Committee of
the National Guard; and a minority, members of the International Working
Men’s Association, chiefly consisting of adherents of the Proudhon
school of socialism. The great majority of the Blanquists at that time
were socialist only by revolutionary and proletarian instinct; only a
few had attained greater clarity on the essential principles, through
Vaillant, who was familiar with German scientific socialism. It is
therefore comprehensible that in the economic sphere much was left
undone which, according to our view today, the Commune ought to have
done. The hardest thing to understand is certainly the holy awe with
which they remained standing respectfully outside the gates of the Bank
of France. This was also a serious political mistake. The bank in the
hands of the Commune – this would have been worth more than 10,000
hostages. It would have meant the pressure of the whole of the French
bourgeoisie on the Versailles government in favor of peace with the
Commune, but what is still more wonderful is the correctness of so much
that was actually done by the Commune, composed as it was of Blanquists
and Proudhonists. Naturally, the Proudhonists were chiefly responsible
for the economic decrees of the Commune, both for their praiseworthy and
their unpraiseworthy aspects; as the Blanquists were for its political
actions and omissions. And in both cases the irony of history willed –
as is usual when doctrinaires come to the helm – that both did the
opposite of what the doctrines of their school proscribed.

Proudhon, the Socialist of the small peasant and master-craftsman,
regarded association with positive hatred. He said of it that there was
more bad than good in it; that it was by nature sterile, even harmful,
because it was a fetter on the freedom of the workers; that it was a
pure dogma, unproductive and burdensome, in conflict as much with the
freedom of the workers as with economy of labor; that its disadvantages
multiplied more swiftly than its advantages; that, as compared with it,
competition, division of labor and private property were economic
forces. Only for the exceptional cases – as Proudhon called them – of
large-scale industry and large industrial units, such as railways, was
there any place for the association of workers. (Cf. Idee Generale de la
Revolution, 3 etude.)

By 1871, even in Paris, the centre of handicrafts, large-scale industry
had already so much ceased to be an exceptional case that by far the
most important decree of the Commune instituted an organization of
large-scale industry and even of manufacture which was not based only on
the association of workers in each factory, but also aimed at combining
all these associations in one great union; in short an organization
which, as Marx quite rightly says in The Civil War, must necessarily
have led in the end to communism, that is to say, the direct antithesis
of the Proudhon doctrine. And, therefore, the Commune was also the grave
of the Proudhon school of socialism. Today this school has vanished from
French working class circles; among them now, among the Possibilists no
less than among the “Marxists”, Marx’s theory rules unchallenged. Only
among the “radical” bourgeoisie are there still Proudhonists.

The Blanquists fared no better. Brought up in the school of conspiracy,
and held together by the strict discipline which went with it, they
started out from the viewpoint that a relatively small number of
resolute, well-organized men would be able, at a given favorable moment,
not only seize the helm of state, but also by energetic and relentless
action, to keep power until they succeeded in drawing the mass of the
people into the revolution and ranging them round the small band of
leaders. This conception involved, above all, the strictest dictatorship
and centralization of all power in the hands of the new revolutionary
government. And what did the Commune, with its majority of these same
Blanquists, actually do? In all its proclamations to the French in the
provinces, it appealed to them to form a free federation of all French
Communes with Paris, a national organization, which for the first time
was really to be created by the nation itself. It was precisely the
oppressing power of the former centralized government, army, political
police and bureaucracy, which Napoleon had created in 1798 and since
then had been taken over by every new government as a welcome instrument
and used against its opponents, it was precisely this power which was to
fall everywhere, just as it had already fallen in Paris.

From the outset the Commune was compelled to recognize that the working
class, once come to power, could not manage with the old state machine;
that in order not to lose again its only just conquered supremacy, this
working class must, on the one hand, do away with all the old repressive
machinery previously used against it itself, and, on the other,
safeguard itself against its own deputies and officials, by declaring
them all, without exception, subject to recall at any moment. What had
been the characteristic attribute of the former state? Society had
created its own organs to look after its common interests, originally
through simple division of labor. But these organs, at whose head was
the state power, had in the course of time, in pursuance of their own
special interests, transformed themselves from the servants of society
into the masters of society, as can be seen, for example, not only in
the hereditary monarchy, but equally also in the democratic republic.
Nowhere do “politicians” form a more separate, powerful section of the
nation than in North America. There, each of the two great parties which
alternately succeed each other in power is itself in turn controlled by
people who make a business of politics, who speculate on seats in the
legislative assemblies of the Union as well as of the separate states,
or who make a living by carrying on agitation for their party and on its
victory are rewarded with positions.

It is well known that the Americans have been striving for 30 years to
shake off this yoke, which has become intolerable, and that in spite of
all they can do they continue to sink ever deeper in this swamp of
corruption. It is precisely in America that we see best how there takes
place this process of the state power making itself independent in
relation to society, whose mere instrument it was originally intended to
be. Here there exists no dynasty, no nobility, no standing army, beyond
the few men keeping watch on the Indians, no bureaucracy with permanent
posts or the right to pensions. and nevertheless we find here two great
gangs of political speculators, who alternately take possession of the
state power and exploit it by the most corrupt means and for the most
corrupt ends – and the nation is powerless against these two great
cartels of politicians, who are ostensibly its servants, but in reality
exploit and plunder it.

Against this transformation of the state and the organs of the state
from servants of society into masters of society – an inevitable
transformation in all previous states – the Commune made use of two
infallible expedients. In this first place, it filled all posts –
administrative, judicial, and educational – by election on the basis of
universal suffrage of all concerned, with the right of the same electors
to recall their delegate at any time. And in the second place, all
officials, high or low, were paid only the wages received by other
workers. The highest salary paid by the Commune to anyone was 6,000
francs. In this way an effective barrier to place-hunting and careerism
was set up, even apart from the binding mandates to delegates to
representative bodies which were also added in profusion.

This shattering of the former state power and its replacement by a new
and really democratic state is described in detail in the third section
of The Civil War. But it was necessary to dwell briefly here once more
on some of its features, because in Germany particularly the
superstitious belief in the state has been carried over from philosophy
into the general consciousness of the bourgeoisie and even to many
workers. According to the philosophical notion, “the state is the
realization of the idea” or the Kingdom of God on earth, translated into
philosophical terms, the sphere in which eternal truth and justice is or
should be realized. And from this follows a superstitious reverence for
the state and everything connected with it, which takes roots the more
readily as people from their childhood are accustomed to imagine that
the affairs and interests common to the whole of society could not be
looked after otherwise than as they have been looked after in the past,
that is, through the state and its well-paid officials. And people think
they have taken quite an extraordinary bold step forward when they have
rid themselves of belief in hereditary monarchy and swear by the
democratic republic. In reality, however, the state is nothing but a
machine for the oppression of one class by another, and indeed in the
democratic republic no less than in the monarchy; and at best an evil
inherited by the proletariat after its victorious struggle for class
supremacy, whose worst sides the proletariat, just like the Commune,
cannot avoid having to lop off at the earliest possible moment, until
such time as a new generation, reared in new and free social conditions,
will be able to throw the entire lumber of the state on the scrap-heap.

Of late, the Social-Democratic philistine has once more been filled with
wholesome terror at the words: Dictatorship of the Proletariat. Well and
good, gentlemen, do you want to know what this dictatorship looks like?
Look at the Paris Commune. That was the Dictatorship of the Proletariat.

Frederick Engels

London, on the 20th anniversary
of the Paris Commune, March 18, 1891.

Footnotes

^([A]) At the time Engels wrote the Introduction he was writing for the
large audience who had already read the popular book by Marx. His
intention was to give new historical data, making for a preface that
would remind readers of the content inside the book, but also provide
additional postscript information to prompt the reader to reread the
work in whole. In this publication we have put the postscript
information into this file, and the historical background and detailed
account of the Civil War into the introduction. In the original
document, the introductory information was placed before the section
break above (i.e. following the paragraph ending: "...as has never again
been attained on all the mass of literature which has been written on
this subject.")

^([B]) The national liberation war of the German people against
Napoleon’s rule in 1813-14.

^([C]) In the 1820s in Germany “demagogues” was applied to the
participants in the Opposition movement among the German intelligentsia,
who came out against the reactionary political system in the German
states and advocated the unification of Germany. “Demagogues” were
ruthlessly persecuted by the authorities.

 News Stories

 June 8-12, 1871
After the defeat of the Paris Commune

I

“The column of prisoners halted in the Avenue Uhrich, and was drawn up,
four or five deep, on the footway facing to the road. General Marquis de
Gallifet and his staff dismounted and commenced an inspection from the
left of the line. Walking down slowly and eyeing the ranks, the general
stopped here and there, tapping a man on the shoulder or beckoning him
out of the rear ranks. In most cases, without further parley, the
individual thus selected was marched out into the centre of the road,
where a small supplementary column was thus soon formed.... A mounted
officer pointed out to General Gallifet a man and woman for some
particular offence. The women, rushing out of the ranks, threw herself
on her knees, and, with outstretched arms, protested her innocence in
passionate terms. The general waited for a pause, and then with most
impassible face and unmoved demeanor, said: ’Madame, I have visited
every theatre in Paris, your acting will have no effect on me.’ (ce
n’est pas la peine de jouer la comedie).... It was not a good thing on
that day to be noticeably taller, dirtier, cleaner, older, uglier than
one’s neighbors. One individual in particular struck me as probably
owing his speedy release from the ills of this world to his having a
broken nose.... Over a hundred being thus chosen, a firing party told
off, and the column resumed its march, leaving them behind. A few
minutes afterwards a dropping fire in our rear commenced, and continued
for over a quarter of an hour. It was the execution of the
summarily-convicted wretches.” (Paris Correspondent, Daily News, June
8.)

This Gallifet, “the kept man of his wife, so notorious for her shameless
exhibitions at the orgies of the Second Empire,” went, during the war,
by the name of the French “Ensign Pistol.”

“The Temps, which is a careful journal, and not given to sensation,
tells a dreadful story of people imperfectly shot and buried before life
was extinct. A great number were buried in the Square round St.
Jacques-la-Bouchiere; some of them very superficially. In the daytime
the roar of the busy streets prevented any notice being taken; but in
the stillness of the night the inhabitants of the houses in the
neighborhood were roused by distant moans, and in the morning a clenched
hand was seen protruding through the soil. In consequence of this,
exhumations were ordered to take place.... that many wounded have been
buried alive I have not the slightest doubt. One case I can vouch for.
When Brunel was shot with his mistress on the 24th ult. in the courtyard
of a house in the place Vendome, the bodies lay there until the
afternoon of the 27th. When the burial party came to remove the corpses,
they found the woman still living, and took her to an ambulance. Though
she had received four bullets she is now out of danger.” (Paris
Correspondent, Evening Standard, June 8.)

II

The following letter appeared in the [London] Times, June 13:

“To the editor of The Times:

“Sir. – On June 6, 1871, M. Jules Favre issued a circular to all the
European Powers, calling them to hunt down the International Working
Men’s Association. A few remarks will suffice to characterize that
document.

“In the very preamble to our statutes it is stated that the
International was found “September 28, 1864, at a public meeting held at
St. Martin’s Hall, Long Acre, London". For purposes of his own Jules
Favre puts back the date of its origin behind 1862.

“In order to explain our principles, he professes to quote “their (the
International’s) sheet of the 25th of March, 1869". And then what does
he quote? The sheet of a society which is not the International. This
sort of maneuvre he already recurred to when, still a comparatively
young lawyer, he had to defend the National newspaper, prosecuted for
libel by Cabet. Then he pretended to read extracts from Cabet’s
pamphlets while reading interpolations of his own – a trick exposed
while the court was sitting, and which, but for the indulgence of Cabet,
would have been punished by Jules Favre’s expulsion for the Paris bar.
Of all the documents quoted by him as documents of the International,
not one belongs to the International.

He says, for instance,

“The Alliance declared itself Atheist, says the General Council,
constituted in London in July 1869.”

“The General Council never issued such a document. On the contrary, it
issued a document which quashed the original statutes of the ’Alliance’
– L’Alliance de la Démocratie Socialiste at Geneva – quoted by Jules
favre.

“Throughout his circular, which pretends in part also to be directed
against the Empire, Jules Favre repeats against the International but
the police inventions of the public prosecutors of the Empire, which
broke down miserably even before the laws courts of that Empire.

“It is known that in its two Addresses (of July and September last) on
the late war, the General Council of the International denounced the
Prussian plans of conquest against France. Later on, Mr. Reitlinger,
Jules Favre’s private secretary, applied, though of course in vain, to
some members of the General Council for getting up by the Council a
demonstration against Bismarck, in favor of the Government of National
Defence; they were particularly requested not to mention the republic.
The preparations for a demonstration with regard to the expected arrival
of Jules Favre in London were made – certainly with the best of
intentions – in spite of the General Council, which, in its address of
the 9th of September, had distinctly forewarned the Paris workmen
against Jules Favre and his colleagues.

“What would Jules Favre say if, in its turn, the International were to
send a circular on Jules Favre to all the Cabinets of Europe, drawing
their particular attention to the document published at Paris by the
late M. Milliere?

I am, Sir, your obedient servant,
John Hales,
Secretary to the General Council of the International Working Men’s
Association

London

June 12th, 1871

In an article on “The International Society and its aims,” that pious
informer, the London Spectator (June 24th), amongst other similar
tricks, quotes, even more fully than Jules Favre has done, the above
document of the “Alliance” as the work of the International, and that
eleven days after the refutation had been published in The Times. We do
not wonder at this. Frederick the Great used to say that of all Jesuits
the worst are the Protestant ones.

Marx to Ludwig Kugelmann
 In Hanover

[London] April 17, 1871

Dear Kugelmann

Your letter duly received. Just at present I have my hands full. Hence
only a few words.

... How you can compare petty-bourgeois demonstrations à la 13 June[1],
1849, etc., with the present struggle in Paris is quite incomprehensible
to me.

World history would indeed be very easy to make, if the struggle were
taken up only on condition of infallibly favorable chances. It would, on
the other hand, be a very mystical nature, if “accidents” played no
part. These accidents themselves fall naturally into the general course
of development and are compensated again by other accidents. But
acceleration and delay are very dependent upon such “accidents,” which
included the "accident" of the character of those who at first stand at
the head of the movement.

The decisive, unfavorable “accident” this time is by no means to be
found in the general conditions of French society, but in the presence
of the Prussians in France and their position right before Paris. Of
this the Parisians were well aware. But of this, the bourgeois canaille
of Versailles were also well aware. Precisely for that reason they
presented the Parisians with the alternative of taking up the fight of
succumbing without a struggle. In the latter case, the demoralization of
the working class against the capitalist class and its state has entered
upon a new phase with the struggle in paris. Whatever the immediate
results may be, a new point of departure of world-historic importance
has been gained. ...

Adieu!

KM

Footnotes

1. On 13 June 1849, the petty-bourgeois party of the Montagne organised
a peaceful demonstration in Paris as a protest against the infringements
of the French constitution by the president and the majority of the
Legislative Assembly. The demonstration was easily dispersed by troops
thus confirming the complete bankruptcy of the petty-bourgeois democrats
in France – Progress Publishers.

History of the Franco-Prussian War (July 19, 1870 - May 10, 1871)

This war marked the end of French hegemony in Europe and resulted in the
creation of Germany as Europe's strongest economic and military power.
The war brought to an end an era of military tactics: close troop
formations and cavalry charges, seriously under assault since the US
Revolutionary war, disappeared from Europe after the war.

Background: In May 1869, Empress Eugenie of France, seeing the gradual
rot and decay of the Empire, declared that the spoils of war would save
the Bonaparte dynasty; namely the expansion of the French border to the
Rhine river. Meanwhile, Prussia had recently defeated Austria in the
Seven Weeks war in 1866, and was a rising power in Europe. By September
1869, an agreement of the growing Prussian threat was reached between
Austria, Italy and France; all three realized that should Prussia ever
unite with the Southern German states, the balance of power in Europe
could be in Prussian hands, with Napolean III explaining: "I can
guarantee peace only as long as Bismarck respects the present status: if
he draws the south German states into the North German Confederation,
our guns will go off by themselves."

On July 2nd 1870, the Provisional Spanish Government proclaimed the
candidature of Prince Leopold of the Hohenzollern dynasty (whose
staunchest supporter was Prussian Chancellor Otto von Bismarck) as the
next King of Spain, succeeding Queen Isabella who had been deposed in
September 1868. Not only was the Prince Prussian, but he was of Southern
German decent and a Catholic -- the prospects of which were dreadful for
France. On July 6th, France protested, and on July 9th, the French
Ambassador to Prussia, Count Vincent Benedetti, requested Kaiser William
I to withdrawal the candidacy while the Kaiser was on vacation at Bad
Ems. On July 12th, Leopold recieved and obeyed his Kaiser's instructions
to step down and withdrawal his candidacy.

The French wanted a greater diplomatic route, and on the next day sent
Ambassador Benedetti to request that Kaiser William I promise that never
again would a Prussian Prince aspire to the Spanish throne. While the
Kaiser was polite and diplomatic in his refusal, Bismarck seized the
moment and published the world over an inflammatory note in the hopes of
instigating a war in his infamous Ems Dispatch. On July 19th, an
outraged Napolean III of France in response declared war on Prussia.

Military Preparedness: The French army was an accomplished force;
re-organised in 1866 to meet with the changing times, they possesed two
powerful technological innovations: the whole army was equipped with the
breech-loading chassepot rifle; and some units were equipped with the
gas powered gattling gun. Previous gatling guns could work only with
hand cranks; but with the introduction of smokeless powder, gatling guns
became internally powered. Since smokeless powder burns at an even rate,
gasses emitted from the explosion of the round are directed to a piston
which rotates the weapon to the next barrel. Without an even rate of
burn the gun would jam or misfire, since an equal amount of power is
needed to turn to the next barrell -- any more or less would not turn
the weapon sufficiently or would turn it too much.

The Prussian military, however, was not without its own innovations and
power. The bolt-action rifle was invented by a Prussian (Dreyse in
1838), and was used for the first time in the war of 1866 with enourmous
success. The Prussian soldiers ripped through Austrian armies, firing
six shots for every one fired by the Austrians. All of Europe realized
the awesome power of the bolt action as a result, and began producing
them in masse. The French version was created by Antoine-Alphonse
Chassepot; an 11 millimetre rifle called the Fusil d'Infanterie Modéle
1866, of which 1.03 million were ready at the outset of the war. The
Prussian rifle featured a much bigger round and a faster rate of fire in
the 15.43 millimetre Zundnadelgewehr Modell 1862, and being equipped
with 1.15 million rifles, Prussian troops were experienced with the pros
and cons of using such a deadly weapon. After the war, both rifles would
be upgraded considerably due to the low quality and reliability of paper
cartridges (a legacy from the musket area), the paper would be replaced
by a metal encasment holding the round and powder.

Furthermore, in what would remain an area of great success and national
pride until the end of the second world war, Prussia had another
tremendous advantage; the theories of Clausewitz (which would be
translated into English after the war) and the genius of General Hulmuth
von Moltke. The Prussian military created an exteremly capable and
effecient Army general staff under the direction of General Moltke as
chief of staff, who planned to excrucating detail the rapid and highly
organised depolyment of massive troop formations to the various battle
fronts. Molke's brilliance was in creating a decentralized command
structure to achieve greater centralization of forces on the
battlefield: "An order shall contain everything that a commander cannot
do by himself, but nothing else." Instead of concentrating troop
movements, Moltke believed in seperating columns while moving into
position and co-ordinating attacks at various points, instead of
launching one massive push. No nation in the world compared to Prussia's
awesome ability, nor gave the same degree of resources and importance,
to managing war in a synergy of decentralization and potency.

Bismark thus had extreme confidence in the capabilities of his military,
and believed that a sucessful war against the thereto all-powerful
France would be cause enough to end centuries of infighting among the
divided states of Germany. Bismark envisioned a united nation of
Germany, with Prussia and its North German Confederation at the helm. At
the outset of war, Bismark saw immediate results: the South German
states of Bavaria, Baden, and Wurttemberg agreed to send troops to
"defend" Prussia as a result of France's declaration of war. This gave
Prussia a large numercial superiority over the French, but the Prussians
were even more prepared for war than all of Europe could imagine.

War: Soldiers of the North German Confederation and the South German
States mobilised and achieved full strategic deployment on the
Trier-Landau line in 13 days. Less than five days later 380,000 Prussian
troops were on France's Eastern border. France was bewildered and in
disarray. Though they had declared the war, their historcial laurels of
arrogance had not thoroughly prepared for it, and they were astonished
to see the armies of those they declared war on marching straight for
France's cities!

As the Prussian's massed huge amounts of soldiers at the front, French
soldiers scurried to their posts late and without proper supplies. The
Prussians devoloped a Northern (1st and 2nd Army) and Southern (3rd
Army) spearhead; to which the French responded by creating a front 180
km long, from Strasbourg to Sierck. On August 4th, the Prussian 3rd Army
attacked the Southern line, and immediately won the border city of
Wissenberg from the French; quickly moving onto capture the city of
Woerth two days later.

  The French held the strong position of Fröschweiler and the heights
  near it [just outside of Woerth] with the utmost tenacity and
  conspicuous bravery.... Little by little we gained ground as the
  battle progressed. The unceasing din of cannon and musketry re-echoed
  loudly in the hills, while the sun had now broken through the clouds.
  Already numerous convoys of prisoners were passing the spot where I
  stood... A sight I shall never forget was that of a rifleman shot
  through the mouth, who was carried by on a stretcher directly under my
  eyes, and kept briskly waving his hand to me as long as ever he could
  see me, as he was unable to speak.... I could clearly recognize that
  little by little the French right wing was being retired--a movement
  the enemy carried out with exemplary skill, while his left wing held
  its ground against the Bavarians with the utmost tenacity. Several
  times over I saw French advances pushed forward with the greatest
  impetuosity, in which Zouaves leapt about with incredible agility; yet
  our gallant fellows repelled every attack successfully.... [After a
  successful push by the Bavarians] The French then were actually on the
  run; they were beaten and we were the victors! MacMahon's tough
  resistance, his practical skill, fighting for a gradual withdrawal,
  were well worthy of admiration - but he relinquished the battle-field
  to me and I had vanquished him.
  War Diary of the Emperor Frederick III (Son of Kaiser William I), Sulz
  6 August, 1870.

After less than a week of fighting, the entire French Rhine Army's
Southern line (the I and V French Corps commanded by Marshal Patrice
MacMahon) couldn't withstand the Prussian aggression and retreated West,
further into French territory. The Prussians were relentless. On the
same day of the French Southern retreat, 65 km to the North, the French
Northern line (II, III and IV Corps, under Marshal Achille Bazaine) were
beaten by the Prussians led by General Helmuth von Moltke near
Saarbrucken, and retreated to the fortress at Metz, marking the begining
of the most important battles of the war. By August 14th, the Prussian
1st Army, bitting at the heals of the retreating French, captured the
city of Pange, about 15km East of Metz. Meanwhile, the Prussian 2nd Army
split from the 1st in a flanking maneavour around Metz, meeting little
resistance on the way, and captured the city of Pont´ Mousson and then
Vionville on August 16th -- a city 20 km West of Metz.

Battles of Mars la Tour and Gravelotte: 130,000 French soldiers were
bottled up in the Fortress of Metz after suffering several defeats at
the front. Shortly four days after their retreat, on the 16th, the
ever-present Prussian forces, here a group of grossly outnumbered 30,000
men of the advanced III Corps (of the 2nd Army) under General
Constantine von Alvensleben, found the French Army near Vionville, east
of Mars-la-Tour. Despite odds of four to one, the heroic III Corps
routed the French and captured Vionville, blocking any further escape
attempts to the West. Once blocked from retreat, the French in the
fortress of Metz had no choice but to fight in a battle that would see
the last majory calvary engagement in Western Europe. III Corps was
decimated by the incesent calvary changes, losing over half its
soldiers, while the French suffered equivelent numerical loses of 16,000
soldiers, but still held onto overwhelming numercial superiortiy. The
following day, on the 17th, the French ran for the hills between
Saint-Privat-la-Montagne and Gravelotte, a few kilometers to the west of
Metz, not realizing the Prussians had outflanked them. The French
secured an extremely defensible position in the hills, and naturally,
the Prussians attacked regardless.

The Prussians invaded St. Privat in the northern tip of the French
forces, and suffered huge loses in bloody door to door fighting at the
hands of fierce French soldiers and citizens. Meanwhile, in the Southern
section of the line near Gravelotte, where French soldiers had dug
themselves into trenches behind a deep ravine, the Prussian soliders
(VII and VIII Corps, led by Moltke) were absolutely slaughtered and
almost totally annihalted in an insane assault attempt, losing over
20,000 men (compared to 13,000 French). When night fell on August 18th,
however, the French general's had eyes only for defeat, and instead of
seizing a perfect opportunity to counter-attack, Bazaine ordered his
valliant troops to pull back to Metz under the cloak of night. The seige
of Metz was thus underway.

Battle of Sedan: Meanwhile, 60 km to the South, the Prussian 3rd Army
was capturing town after town, while thier defeated opponents of the
French Rhine Army (I and V Corps) hastily retreated to Chalon-s.-Marne
making sure to stay out of the way of the advancing Prussians by heading
Southwest while the Prussians drove West.

The 120,000 strong remnants of the French Rhine army (I, VII, XII
Corps), was now led by both Mac-Mahon and Napoleon III. The French began
marching from Chalons-s.-Marne North/Northeast, in an attempt to rally
the besieged army at Metz over 130 km to the East (leaving V and VI
Corps behind to protect Chalons-s.Marne, which the Prussians would never
end up attacking). But the Prussian 3rd Army advance was incredible; in
less than 3 weeks the army covered over 325 km, and intercepted the
French army along the Meuse River, and for three days battled it (August
29 to 31), forcing the French to fall to Sedan. Meanwhile, the Prussians
had created a 4th Army from the IV and XII Corps of the 2nd Army, and
marched the 4th to the Southern flank of Sedan, while the 3rd Army dug
in North of Sedan.

On September 1, 1870, the Prussians thus layed siege to the city of
Sedan. Standing at the gates was a powerful force of 200,000 Prussian
soldiers under the prolific General Helmuth von Moltke. The French were
highly indecisive, allowing the Germans to move in re-inforcements to
completely encircle Sedan. The French would then counter the
encirclement with bloody but largely ineffective cavalry charges. The
Prussians were not merely content to lay seige with Napolean III captive
behind city walls, however, and thus launched a massive offensive on
September 2nd. Napolean quickly surrendered, along with his remaining
83,000 French troops. The Prussians then began their march on Paris.

The Seige of Paris: In France, a new goverment arose in Paris on
September 4th, 1870, and declared the establishment of the Third
Republic. But by September 19, the Prussians began to besiege Paris.
French citizens and soldiers began fighting the Prussians in a guerilla
war, achieving much better results than they had as a conventional army
commanded by weak leadership. The couragous Léon Gambetta escaped Paris
in a baloon, and began organising a new convential army in the
countryside. After learning that Bismark would settle for nothing less
than Alsace and Lorraine, Jules Favre, foreign minister in the
Government for National Defence, broke off peace negotiations. But the
French army was without hope, and its leadership decimated; the fortress
at Metz finally fell on October 27th, after Bazaine surrendered along
with his 140,000 soldiers. On 27th December 1870, on Bismarck's orders
and against the advice of the Empress and General Moltke, Paris was
bombarded. Paris endured several months of hardship while making many
attempts to break the seige, but finally gave in as well, on January 28,
1871.

Treaty of Frankfurt: The fall of Paris was allowed by the French leaders
so long as a French National Assembly could be elected with the
authority to conclude a definite peace. Adolphe Thiers and Favre came to
consensus on this agreement after lengthy deliberations on February 26,
and it was ratified on March 1. This gave cause for the rise to the
Paris Commune, which overthrew the power of the French burecrats in
Paris and aimed at liberating all of France for the working people
themselves. The Commune was betrayed by the same cowardly French
generals who fled the battle fields months earlier, Generals who
commanded French brothers to set their sights on their fellow workers to
appease their new Prussian lords and the desperate French aristocracy.
After tens of thousands of citizens of Paris were slaughtered and shot
without trial in a vicous blood bath ordered by the French aristocrats,
Prussia enacted the terms of its treaty on May 10, 1871: Prussia annexed
Alsace, Moselle, Haut Rhine, Bas Rhine, and half of Lorraine; in
addition France had to pay an indemnity of 5 billion francs. Until the
reparations were paid, the Prussians would continue to occupy France and
charge France for all costs associated with the continued occupation.

The victory of Prussia brought about the union of Germany under Prussian
hegemony. Wilhelm I was crowned Emperor of Germany at Versailles on 18th
January 1871.

[Speaking on the next great war Germany would wage:] "Its length will be
incalculable and its end nowhere in sight... and woe to him who first
sets fire to Europe, who first puts the flame to the powderkeg!"

Helmuth Karl von Moltke, 1890

By the outbreak of World War I, every nation in Europe had rebuilt thier
armies around the tactics and principles envisioned by Moltke, but none
would use it so effectively as his German inheritors for decades to
come.

Prussian battle statistics for August 4 to January 28:
156 "significant small actions"
17 major battles
26 fortresses captured
11,650 French Officers captured
363,000 French Soldiers captured

Battle dates redux:
August: 13 actions, 8 battles at Wissembourg (4th), Wörth (6th),
Spicheren (6th), Courcelles, Vionville, Gravelotte (18th), Noisseville,
Beaumont-Sedan; 4 fortress were taken- Lützelstein, Lichtenberg, Marsal,
Vitry.
September: 13 actions, Sedan (1st); 4 fortresses were taken: Sedan,
Lyon, Toul (23rd), Strasbourg.
October: 37 actions; 3 fortresses were taken: Soissons (15th),
Schlettstadt, Metz.
November: 15 actions, 2 battles at Amiens and Beaune-la-Rolande; 7
fortresses were taken: Verdun, Montbéliard, Neuf-Brisach, Ham,
Thionville, La Fère (27th), the Citadel of Amiens.
December: 30 actions, the battles around Orleans and on the Hallue; 2
fortresses were taken: Pfalzburg, Montmédy.
January: 48 actions, 3 battles at Le Mans, Montbéliard, and St.Quentin
(19th); 5 fortresses were taken: Mézières, Rocroy, Péronne, Longwy,
Paris.

 Timeline of The Civil War in France

 1870

January 10: About 100,000 people demonstrate against Bonaparte's Second
Empire after the death of Victor Noir, a republican journalist killed by
the Emperor's cousin, Pierre Bonaparte.

May 8: A national plebiscite votes confidence in the Empire with about
84% of votes in favour. On the eve of the plebiscite members of the
Paris Federation were arrested on a charge of conspiring against
Napoleon III. This pretext was further used by the government to launch
a campaign of persecution of the members of the International throughout
France.

¤ July 19: After a diplomatic struggle over the Prussian attempt for the
Spanish throne, Louis Bonaparte declares war on Prussia.

July 23: Marx completes what will become known as his "First Address."

July 26: The "First Address" is approved and internationally distributed
by the General Council of the International Working Men's Association.

¤ August 4-6: Crown Prince Frederick, commanding one of the three
Prussian armies invading France, defeats French Marshal MacMahon at
Worth and Weissenburg, pushes him out of Alsace (NorthEastern France),
surrounds Strasbourg, and drives on towards Nancy. The other two
Prussian armies isolate Marshal Bazaine's forces in Metz.

¤ August 16-18: French Commander Bazaine's efforts to break his soldiers
through the German lines are bloodily defeated at Mars-la-Tour and
Gravelotte. The Prussians advance on Chalons.

¤ September 1: Battle of Sedan. MacMahon and Bonaparte, attempting to
relieve Bazaine at Metz and finding the road closed, enters battle and
is defeated at Sedan.

¤ September 2: Emperor Napoleon III and Marshal MacMahon capitulate at
Sedan with over 83,000 soldiers.

September 4: At news of Sedan, Paris workers invade the Palais Bourbon
and force the Legislative Assembly to proclaim the fall of the Empire.
By evening, the Third Republic is proclaimed at the Hotel de Ville (the
City Hall) in Paris. The provisional Government of National Defence
(GND) is established to continue the war effort to remove Germany from
France.

September 5: A series of meetings and demonstrations begin in London and
other big cities, at which resolutions and petitions were passed
demanding that the British Government immediately recognize the French
Republic. The General Council of the First International took a direct
part in the organization of this movement.

September 6: GND issues statement: blames war on Imperial government, it
now wants peace, but "not an inch of our soil, not a stone of our
fortresses, will we cede." With Prussia occupying Alsace-Lorraine, the
war does not stop.

¤ September 19: Two German armies begin the long siege of Paris.
Bismarck figures the "soft and decadent" French workers will quickly
surrender. The GND sends a delegation to Tours, soon to be joined by
Gambetta (who escapes from Paris in a balloon), to organize resistance
in the provinces.

¤ October 27: French army, led by Bazaine with 140,000-180,000 men at
Metz, surrenders.

¤ October 30: French National Guard defeated at Le Bourget.

October 31: Upon the receipt of news that the Government of National
Defense had decided to start negotiations with the Prussians, Paris
workers and revolutionary sections of the National Guard rise up in
revolt, led by Blanqui. They seize the Hôtel de Ville (City Hall) and
set up their revolutionary government — the Committee of Public Safety,
headed by Blanqui. On October 31, Flourens prevents any members of the
Government of National Defense from being shot, as had been demanded by
one of the insurrectionists.

November 1: Under pressure from the workers the Government of National
Defense promises to resign and schedule national elections to the
Commune — promises it has no intention to deliver. With the workers
pacified by their 'legal' charade, the government violently seizes the
Hôtel de Ville and re-establishes its domination over the besieged city.
Paris official Blanqui is arrested for treason.

 1871

January 22: The Paris proletariat and the National Guards hold a
revolutionary demonstration, initiated by the Blanquists. They demand
the overthrow of the government and the establishment of a Commune. By
order of the Government of National Defense, the Breton Mobile Guard,
which was defending the Hôtel de Ville, opens fire on the demonstrators.
After massacring the unarmed workers, the government begins preparations
to surrender Paris to the Germans.

January 28: After four long months of workers struggle, Paris is
surrendered to the Prussians. While all regular troops are disarmed, the
National Guard is permitted to keep their arms — the populous of Paris
remains armed and allows the occupying armies only a small section of
the city.

Febuary 8: Elections held in France, unknown to most of the nation's
population.

Febuary 12: New National Assembly opens at Bordeaux; two-thirds of
members are conservatives and wish the war to end.

February 16: The Assembly elects Adolphe Thiers chief executive.

February 26: The preliminary peace treaty between France and Germany
signed at Versailles by Thiers and Jules Favre, on the one hand, and
Bismarck, on the other. France surrenders Alsace and East Lorraine to
Germany and paid it indemnities to the sum of 5 billion francs. German
army of occupation to slowly withdraw as indemnity payments made. The
final peace treaty was signed in Frankfort-on-Main on May 10, 1871.

March 1-3: After months of struggle and suffering, Paris workers react
angrily to the entry of German troops in the city, and the ceaseless
capitulation of the government. The National Guard defects and organizes
a Central Committee.

March 10: The National Assembly passes a law on the deferred payment of
overdue bills; under this law the payment of debts on obligations
concluded between August 13 and November 12, 1870 could be deferred.
Thus, the law leads to the bankruptcy of many petty bourgeoisie.

March 11: National Assembly adjourns. With trouble in Paris, it
establishes its government at Versailles on March 20.

March 18: Adolphe Thiers attempts to disarm Paris and sends French
troops (regular army), but, through fraternization with Paris workers,
they refuse to carry out their orders. Generals Claude Martin Lecomte
and Jacques Leonard Clement Thomas are killed by their own soldiers.
Many troops peacefully withdraw, some remain in Paris. Thiers outraged,
the Civil War begins.

March 26: A municipal council — the Paris Commune — is elected by the
citizens of Paris. Commune consists of workers, among them members of
the First International and followers of Proudhon and Blanqui.

March 28: The Central Committee of the National Guard, which up to then
had carried on the government, resigns after it first decrees the
permanent abolition of the "Morality Police".

March 30: The Commune abolishes conscription and the standing army; the
National Guard, in which all citizens capable of bearing arms were to be
enrolled, was to be the sole armed force. The Commune remitts all
payments of rent for dwelling houses from October 1870 until April 1871.
On the same day the foreigners elected to the Commune were confirmed in
office, because "the flag of the Commune is the flag of the World
Republic".

April 1: The Commune declares that the highest salary received by any
member of the Commune does not exceed 6,000 francs

April 2: In order to suppress the Paris Commune Thiers appeals to
Bismarck for permission to supplement the Versailles Army with French
prisoners of war, most of whom had been serving in the armies that
surrendered at Sedan and Metz. In return for the 5 billion francs
indemnity payment, Bismarck agrees. The French Army begins seige of
Paris. Paris is continually bombarded and, moreover, by the very people
who had stigmatized as a sacrilege the bombardment of the same city by
the Prussians.

The Commune decrees the separation of the Church from the State, and the
abolition of all state payments for religious purposes as well as the
transformation of all Church property into national property. Religion
is declared a purely private matter.

April 5: Decree on hostages adopted by the Commune in an attempt to
prevent Communards from being shot by the French Government. Under this
decree, all persons found guilty of being in contact with the French
Government were declared hostages. This was never carried out.

April 6: The guillotine was brought out by the 137th battalion of the
National guard, and publicly burnt, amid great popular rejoicing.

April 7: On April 7, the French army captures the Seine crossing at
Neuilly, on the western front of Paris.

Reacting to French government policy of shooting captured Communards,
Commune issues an "eye-for-an-eye" policy statement, threatening
retaliation. The bluff is quickly called; Paris workers execute no one.

April 8: A decree excluding from the schools all religious symbols,
pictures, dogmas, prayers — in a word, "all that belongs to the sphere
of the individual's conscience" — is ordered to be excluded from the
schools. The decree is gradually applied.

April 11: In an attack on southern Paris the French army is repulsed
with heavy losses by General Eudes.

April 12: The Commune decides that the Victory Column on the Place
Vendôme, which had been cast from guns captured by Napoleon after the
war of 1809, should be demolished as a symbol of chauvinism and
incitement to national hatred. This decree was carried out on May 16.

April 16: Commune announces the postponement of all debt obligations for
three years and abolition of interest on them.

The Commune orders a statistical tabulation of factories which had been
closed down by the manufacturers, and the working out of plans for the
carrying on of these factories by workers formerly employed in them, who
were to be organized in co-operative societies, and also plans for the
organization of these co-operatives in one great union.

April 20: The Commune abolishes night work for bakers, and also the
workers' registration cards, which since the Second Empire had been run
as a monopoly by police nominees — exploiters of the first rank; the
issuing of these registration cards was transferred to the mayors of the
20 arrondissements of Paris.

April 23: Thiers breaks off the negotiations for the exchange, proposed
by Commune, of the Archbishop of Paris [Georges Darboy] and a whole
number of other priests held hostages in Paris, for only one man,
Blanqui, who had twice been elected to the Commune but was a prisoner in
Clairvaux.

April 27: In sight of the impending municipal elections of April 30,
Thiers enacted one of his great conciliation scenes. He exclaimed from
the tribune of the Assembly: "There exists no conspiracy against the
republic but that of Paris, which compels us to shed French blood. I
repeat it again and again...". Out of 700,000 municipal councillors, the
united Legitimists, Orleanists, and Bonapartists (Party of Order) did
not carry 8,000.

April 30: The Commune orders the closing of the pawnshops, on the ground
that they were a private exploitation of labor, and were in
contradiction with the right of the workers to their instruments of
labor and to credit.

May 5: On May 5 it ordered the demolition of the Chapel of Atonement,
which had been built in expiation of the execution of Louis XVI.

May 9: Fort Issy, which is completely reduced to ruins by gunfire and
constant French bombardement, is captured by the French army.

May 10: The peace treaty concluded in February now signed, known as
Treaty of Frankfurt. (Endorsed by National Assembly May 18.)

May 16: The Vendôme Column is pulled down. The Vendôme Column was
erected between 1806 and 1810 in Paris in honor of the victories of
Napoleonic France; it was made out of the bronze captured from enemy
guns and was crowned by a statue of Napoleon.

May 21-28: Versailles troops enter Paris on May 21. The Prussians who
held the northern and eastern forts allowed the Versailles troops to
advance across the land north of the city, which was forbidden ground to
them under the armistice — Paris workers held the flank with only weak
forces. As a result of this, only a weak resistance was put up in the
western half of Paris, in the luxury city; while it grew stronger and
more tenacious the nearer the Versailles troops approached the eastern
half, the working class city.

The French army spent eight days massacring workers, shooting civilians
on sight. The operation was led by Marshal MacMahon, who would later
become president of France. Tens of thousands of Communards and workers
are summarily executed (as many as 30,000); 38,000 others imprisoned and
7,000 are forcibly deported.

Table of Contents

Contents

Introduction

1891 Introduction by Frederick Engels On the 20th Anniversary of the
Paris Commune

Chapter 1 The First Address July 23, 1870

Chapter 2 The Second Address September 9, 1870

Chapter 3 The Third Address May, 1871

Chapter 4 The Third Address May, 1871

Chapter 5 The Third Address May, 1871

Chapter 6 The Third Address May, 1871

1891 Postscript by Friedrich Engels

News Stories

Marx to Ludwig Kugelmann In Hanover

History of the Franco-Prussian War (July 19, 1870 - May 10, 1871)

Timeline of The Civil War in France
